Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on Hbrary shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http : //books . google . com/| 



I - ' 



» « V 




1 



HARVARD COLLEGE 

LAMONT LIBRARY 



l^^% »Til 




IN MEMORY OF 

May Hanford MacNider 

MOTHER 

AND GRANDMOTHER 

OF HARVARD MEN 







HISTORY AND ROOT 



OF THE PRINCIPLE OF THE 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



BY 

ERNST MACH 



TRANSLATED FROM THE GERMAN AND ANNOTATED BY 

PHILIP E. B. JOURDAIN, M.A. (Cantah.) 



CHICAGO 
THE OPEN COURT PUBLISHING CO 

LONDON 

KEGAN PAUL, TKENCR, TRÜBNBE ft CO., LTD. 

1911 




HARVARD 

UNIVERSITY 

U6RARY 



> ^ 



/ 



'/")■:>, ■ 




COFYKIGHT Z9XO Bv 

Tm Opbn Court Pubushing C0.9 
Chicago, Ilunois, U. S. A. 



CONTENTS 

FAOB 

Translator's Preface 5 

Author's Preface to the Second Edition . . 9 

The History and the Root of the Principle of 

THE Conservation of Energy .... 13 

I. Introduction 15 

II. On the History of the Theorem of the Con- 
servation of Work 19 

III. Mechanical Physics 42 

IV. The Logical Root of the Theorem of Excluded 

Perpetual Motion 59 

Author's Notes 75 

Author's Notes to the Second Edition . . 93 

Translator's Notes \ . . . 96 



/ 



TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE 

The pamphlet of fifty-eight pages entitled Die 
Geschichte und die Wurzel des Satzes von der Erhaltung 
der Arbeit. ^ Vortrag gehalten in der k. böhm. Gesellschaft 
der Wissenschaften am 15. Nov. 187 1 von E. Mach, Pro- 
fessor der Physik an der Universität Prag was published 
at Prague in 1872, and a second — unaltered — edition at 
Leipzig (Barth) in 1909. To this second edition (pp, 
iv, 60) were added a short preface and a few notes by 
Mach himself. This preface is translated below. 

Quite apart from the interest which must attach to 
the first sketch of a way of regarding science which has 
become of such great importance to students both of 
science and of the theory of knowledge, this pamphlet is 
quite essential to the thorough understanding of Mach's 
work. Li the first place, it contains a reprint of Mach's 
article (1868) on the definition of mass, which is, per- 
haps, his most important contribution to mechanics; 
and, in the second place, the discussion of the logical 
root of the prin"* 'e of the conservation of energy is 
fuller than that in any of his later publications.' 

I In the title of this translation, Arbeit is translated by Energy, 
as this word conveys a better idea, at the present time, than the older 
and more literal equivalent of Work. In the text, on the other 
hand, the word Work will always be used, as it corresponds more 
closely to the terminology of science at the time of the first publication 
of this essay. 

a Thus, the questions connected with the uniqueness of determi- 
nation of events are discussed and illustrated very fully in this essay, 

5 



6 TRA NSLA TOR'S PREFACE 

It is proper here to give some references to discus- 
sions of Mach's point of view in science. 

A fairly good general account of Mach's various 
works was given in Harald Höffding's lectures on 
modem philosophers held at the University of Copen- 
hagen in 1902;^ and another account, with a hostile 
criticism, was given by T. Case in his article "Meta- 
physics" in the new volumes which make up the tenth 
edition of the Encyclopaedia Britannka.^ Often valu- 
able criticisms of Mach's position are to be found in the 
reviews of the first and second editions of the Analyse 
der Empfindungen written by C. Stumpf,^ Elsas,^ 
Lucien Arr&t,^ and W. R. Boyce Gibson.* 

The last-named writer speaks^ of the "generous 

and it was this essay ihat formed the starting-point of Petzoldt's 
development of the view involved. 

The essay "On the Principle of the Conservation of Energy" 
in Mach's Popular Scientific Lectures (3d ed., Open Court Publishing 
Co., 1898, pp. 137-185), though in many respects like the pamphlet 
of 1872, is not nearly so complete as it is — a remark made by Hans 
Kleinpeter {Die Erkenntnistheorie der Naturforschung der Gegemvarty 
Leipzig, 190$, p. 150), who therefore pointed out the need for a 
reprint of this rare pamphlet. 

3 In the German translation, by F. Bendixen, of these lectures 
under the title: Moderne Philosophen (Leipzig, 1905), the part 
relating to Mach is on pp. 1 04-1 10. The section devoted to Maxwell, 
Mach, Hertz, Ostwald, and Avenarius is on pp. 97-127. 

4 Vol. XXX, pp. 665-667. Cf. also the references to Mach's 
work in Ludwig Boltzmann's article "Models" {ibid.^ pp. 788-790.) 

5 Deutsche Litteraturzeitung^ Nr. 27, 3. Juli, 1886. 

6 Philosophische Monatshefte^ Vol. XXIII, p. 207. 

7 Revue PhilosophiquCj 1887, p. 80. 

8 Mind, N.S., Vol. X, pp. 246-264 (No. 38, April, 1901). 

9 Ibid.y p. 253. 



TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE 7 

recognition he [Mach] is always ready to give to any- 
one who succeeds in improving upon his own attempts," 
and "his still more eager readiness to put fact before 
theory. With this eagerness to find out the truth is 
associated a corresponding ardour in developing and 
applying it when found." 

But philosophers seem hardly to have done justice 
to Mach's work. Mach himself, indeed, has repeatedly 
disclaimed for himself the name of philosopher; yet, in 
a sense, any man who forms a general position from 
which to regard, say, science, is a philosopher.'*' It 
must be acknowledged that the least satisfactory parts 
of Mach's writings are those in which he discusses 
mathematical conceptions, such as numbers and the 
continuum; and in which he implies that logic is to be 
founded on a psychological basis; but such things are 
unconnected with the greater part of his valuable work. 

There are three sets of notes to this translation. 
The first set, referred to by numerals in the body of the 
text, consists of the notes added by the author to the 

" Through a reference in the Jahrbuch über die Fortschritte der 
Mathematik for 1904 (Bd. XXXV, p. 78) I learn that D. Wiktorov 
has published, in Russian, an exposition of Mach's philosophical 
views, in the periodical whose name, translated, is Questions of Phi- 
losophy and Psychology, No. 73 (1904, No. 3), pp. 228-313. 

J. Baumann (Archiv für systematische PhHos., IV, 189 7-1 898, 
Heft I, October, 1897) gave an accoimt of "Mach's philosophy." 
Cf. also Hönigswald, Zur Kritik der Mach*schen Philosophief Berlin, 
1903; and Mach, Erkenntnis und Irrtum, 1906, pp. vii-ix. Adolfo 
Levi ("H fenomeivsmo empiristico," Riv. di Fil., T. I., 1909) 
analyzed the theories of knowledge of Mill, Avenarius, Mach, and 
Ostwald. 



8 TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE 

original edition; the second set consists of those added 
by the author to the reprint of 1909;' ' and the third set, 
which contains some account of later work by the author 
and others on subjects connected with the history and 
root of the principle of the conservation of work, has 
been added by the translator. Any other notes by the 
translator, added for the purpose of giving fuller refer- 
ences, are enclosed in square brackets. 

Professor Mach has been most kind in carefully 
reading my manuscript; and so I trust that not all of 
the freshness, the force of conviction, and the humour 
of the original are lost in the present translation.^^ 

Philip E. B. Jourdain 

The Manor House 

Broad WINDSOR 
Beaminster, Dorset 

November, 1909 

»' These notes are translated, with the exception of one correcting 
a misprint in the original edition. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE TO THE SECOND 

EDITION 

In this pamphlet, which appeared in 1872, I made 
the first attempt to give an adequate exposition of my 
epistemological standpoint — which is based on a study 
of the physiology of the senses — with respect to science 
as a whole, and to express it more clearly in so far as it 
concerns physics. In it both every metaphysical and 
every one-sided mechanical view of physics were kept 
away, and an arrangement, according to the principle 
of economy of thought, of facts — of what is ascertained 
by the senses — was recommended. The investigation 
of the dependence of phenomena on one another was 
pointed out as the aim of natural science. The 
digressions, connected with this, on causality, space, 
and time, may then have appeared far from the point 
and hasty; but they were developed in my later writ- 
ings, and do not, perhaps, lie so far from the science 
of to-day. Here, too, are to be found the fundamental 
ideas of the Mechanik of 1883," of the Analyse der 
Empfindungen of 1886,^^ which was addressed prin- 

"[Die Mechanik in ihrer Entwickelung historisch-kritisch dar- 
gesteUtf Leipzig, five editions from 1883 to 1904; English translation 
by T. J. McCormack under the title The Science of MechanicSy Open 
Court Publishing Co., Chicago, three editions from 1893 ^ ^9^7 0-^^ 
third edition of this is quoted hereafter as Mechanics).] 

13 [Beiträge zur Analyse der Empfindungen, Jena, 1886; Eng. 
trans, by C. M. Williams under the title Contributions to the Analysis 
of the Sensations, Open Court Publishing Co., Chicago, 1897. A 

9 



lO AUTHOR'S PREFACE 

* 

cipally to biologists, in the Wärmelehre of 1896,'^ and in 

the Erkenntnis und Irrtum — a book which treats at 

length questions of the epistemology of physics — of 
1905.^5 

Certainly it is right that, in response to repeated 
demands, this work, which was out of print twelve 
years ago, should appear in an unaltered form. I could 
not have entertained sanguine expectations as to the 
immediate result of my little work; indeed, many years 
before, PoggendorflF had refused for his Annalen my 
short essay on the definition of mass, which definition 
is now generally accepted. When Max Planck wrote, 
fifteen years after I did, on the conservation of energy, ^*^ 
he had a remark directed against one of my develop- 
ments, without which remark one would have supposed 
that he had not seen my pamphlet at all. But it was a 
ray of hope for me when Kirchhoflf*^ pronoimced, in 
1874, the problem of mechanics to be the complete and 
simplest description of motions, and this nearly corre- 

second, much enlarged, German edition was published at Jena in 
1900 under the title: Die Analyse der Empfindungen und das Ver- 
hältnis des Physischen zum Psychischen; and a fifth edition appeared 
in 1906.] 

14 [Die Principien der Wärmelehre historisch-kritisch entwickelty 
Leipzig, 1896; 2d ed., 1900. The 2d edition is hereafter referred to 
as Wärmelehre.] 

15 [Erkenntnis und Irrtum. Skizzen zur Psychologie der Forschung^ 
Leipzig, 1905; 2d ed., 1906.] 

^^[Das Prinzip der Erhaltung der Energie^ Leipzig, 1887; 2d ed., 
1909. The reference to Mach's work of 1872 is on p. 156 of the 
second edition.] 

^T [Vorlesungen über mathematische Physik, Bd. /, Mechanik^ 
Leipzig, 1874; 4th ed., 1897.] 



AUTHORS PREFACE 1 1 

sponded to the economical representation of facts. Helm 
esteemed the principle of the economy of thought and the 
tendency of my little treatise towards a general science of 
energetics. And, finally, though H. Hertz did not give 
an open expression of his sympathy, yet the utterances 
in his Mechanik of 1894'® coincide as exactly as is pos- 
sible with my own,"^ considering that Hertz was a sup- 
porter of the mechanical and atomic physics and a 
follower of Kant. So those whose positions are near 
to' mine are not the worst of men. But since, even at 
the present time, when I have almost reached the limit 
of human age, I can count on my fingers those whose 
standpoint is more or less near to my own — men like 
Stallo,»*» W. K. Clifford, J Popper, W. Ostwald, K. 
Pearson, ^^ F. Wald, and P. Duhem, not to speak of the 
younger generation — it is evident that in this con- 
nexion we have to do with a very small minority. I 
cannot, then, share the apprehension that appears to 
lie behind utterances like that of M. Planck,*' that 

»8 [Die PHnzipe der Mechanik, Vol. Ill of Hertz's Ges, Werken 
Leipzig, 1894; Eng. trans, by D. E. Jones and J. T. Walley, under 
the title The Principles of Mechanics, London, 1899.] 

^9 [On Hertz's mechanics, see Mach, Mechanics, pp. 548-555.] 

*o [The Concepts and Theories of Modern Physics, 4th ed., Lon- 
don, 1900.] 

" [The Grammar of Science, London, 1892; 2d ed., 1900. The 
account of the laws of motion in W. K. Clifford's book: The Common 
Sense of the Exact Sciences (London, 1885, 5th ed., 1907), which was 
completed by Pearson, agrees with Mach's views; but this statement 
was due, not to Clifford, but to Pearson, whose (see pp viii-ix of the 
work just mentioned) views were developed independently.] 

aa [Die Einheit des physiccUischen Welthildes, Leipzig, 1909, 
pp. 31-38.] 



ii 



12 AUTHORS PREFACE 

orthodox physics has need of such a powerful speech 
in its defence. Rather do I fear that, with or without 
such speeches, the simple, natural, and indeed inevi- 
table reflections which I have tried to stir up will only 
come into their rights very late. 

"Not every physicist is an epistemologist, and not 
everyone must or can be one. Special investigation 
claims a whole man, so also does the theory of knowl- 
edge."*^ This must be my answer to the excessively 
naive demand of a physicist who was justly celebrated 
and is now dead, that I should wait with my analysis 
of the sensations imtil we knew the paths of the atoms 
in the brain, from which paths all would easily result. 
The physicist who thinks imder the guidance of a work- 
ing hypothesis usually corrects his concepts sufficiently 
by accurate comparison of the theory with observation, 
and has little occasion to trouble himself with the psy- 
chology of knowledge. But whoever wishes to criticize 
a theory of knowledge or instruct others about it, must 
know it and have thought it out. I cannot admit that 
my physicist critics have done this, as I will show with- 
out difficulty at the proper place. 

E. Mach 

Vienna 
May, 1909 

23 Analyse der Empfindungen, 5th ed., p. 255. 



THE HISTORY AND THE ROOT OF THE 
PRINCIPLE OF THE CONSERVA- 
TION OF ENERGY 



INTRODUCTION ^ 

HE who calls to mind the time when he obtained his 
first view of the world from his mother's teaching 
will surely remember how upside-down and strange 
things then appeared to him. For instance, I recol- 
lect the fact that I foimd great difficulties in two phe- 
nomena especially. In the first place, I did not imder- 
stand how people could like letting themselves be ruled 
by a king even for a minute. The second difficulty 
was that which Lessing so deliciously put into an 
epigram, which may be roughly rendered: 

"One thing I've often thought is queer," 
Said Jack to Ted, "the which is 
"That wealthy folk upon our sphere, 
"Alone possess the riches."* 

The many fruitless attempts of my mother to help me 
over these two problems must have led her to form a 
very poor opinion of my intelligence. 

Everybody will remember similar experiences in his 
own youth. There are two ways of reconciling oneself 
with actuality: either one grows accustomed to the 
puzzles and they trouble one no more, or one learns to 

*"Es ist doch sonderbar bestellt," 

Sprach Hänschen Schlau zu Vetter Fritzen, 
"Dass nur die Reichen in der Welt 
''Das meiste Geld besitzen." 

15 



l6 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

understand them by the help of history and to consider 
them cahnly from that point of view. 

Quite analogous difficulties lie in wait for us when, 
we go to school and take up more advanced studies, 
when propositions which have often cost several thou- 
sand years' labour of thought are represented to us as 
self-evident. Here too there is only one way to enlight- 
enment: historical studies. 

The following considerations, which, if I except my 
reading of Kant and Herbart, have arisen quite inde- 
pendently of the influence of others, are based upon 
some historical studies. The reason why, in discussion 
of these thoughts with able colleagues of mine, I could 
not, as a rule, come to agreement, and why my col- 
leagues always tended to seek the groimd of such 
"strange" views in some confusion of mine, was, with- 
out doubt, that historical studies are not so generally 
cultivated as they should be.' 

However this may be, these thoughts, which, as the 
notes and quotations from my earlier writings show, 
are not of very recent date, but which I have held since 
the year 1862, were not suited for discussion with my 
colleagues — I, at least, soon tired of such discussions. 
With the exception of some short notices written on the 
occasion of other works and in journals little read by 
physicists, but which may sufläce to prove my independ- 
ence, I have published nothing about these thoughts. 

I In fact, I have known only one man, Josef Popper, with whom 
I could discuss the views exposed here without rousing a horrified 
opposition. Popper and I, indeed, arrived at similar views on many 
points of physics independently of one another, which fact I take 
pleasure in mentioning here. 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 17 

But now, since some renowned investigators have 
begun to set foot in this province, perhaps I, too, may 
bring my small contribution to the classification of the 
questions with which we are concerned. I must protest 
at once against this investigation being considered a 
metaphysical one. We are accustomed to call concepts 
metaphysical, if we have forgotten how we reached them. 
One can never lose one's footing, or come into collision 
with facts, if one always keeps in view the path by which 
one has come. This pamphlet merely contains straight- 
forward reflections on some facts belonging both to 
natural science and to history. 

Perhaps the following lines will also show the value 
of the historical method in teaching. Indeed, if from 
history one learned nothing else than the variability of 
views, it would be invaluable. Of science, more than 
anything else, Heraclitus's words are true: "One can- 
not go up the same stream twice." Attempts to fix 
the fair moment by means of textbooks have always 
&iled. Let us, then, early get used to the fact that 
science is imfinished, variable. 

Whoever knows only one view or one form of a view 
does not believe that another has ever stood in its 
place, or that another will ever succeed it; he neither 
doubts nor tests. If we extol, as we often do, the 
value of what is called a classical education, we can 
hardly maintain seriously that this results from an eight- 
years' discipline of declining and conjugating. We 
believe, rather, that it can do us no harm to know the 
point of view of another eminent nation, so that we can, 
on occasion, put ourselves in a diflFerent position from 



1 8 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

that in which we have been brought up. The essence 
of classical education is historical education. 

But if this is correct, we have a much too narrow 
idea of classical education. Not the Greeks alone 
concern us, but all the cultured people of the past. 
Indeed there is, for the investigator of nature, a special 
classical education which consists in the knowledge of 
the historical development of his science. 

Let us not let go the guiding hand of histojy. His- 
tory has made all; history can alter all. Let us expect 
from history all, but first and foremost, and I hope this 
of my historical investigation, that it may not be too 
tedious. 






n 

ON THE HISTORY OF THE THEOREM OF 
THE CONSERVATION OF WORK 

THE place given to the law of the conservation of 
energy in modem science is such a prominent 
one that the question as to its validity, which I will try 
to answer, obtrudes itself, as it were, of itself. I have 
allowed myself, in the headline, to call the law that of 
the conservation of work, because it appeared to me 
to be a name which is understood by aU and-PPcvents 



wr^^gJd^. Let us call to mind the considerations, 
laden with misunderstandings, of the great Faraday 
on the "law of the conservation of force," and a well- 
known controversy which was not much poorer in ob- 
scurities. One should say " law of the conservation of 
force" only when one, with J. R. Mayer, calls "force" 
what Euler called "effort'^ and Poncelet '^ travail. ^^ 
Of course, one cannot find fault with Mayer, who did 
not get his concepts from the schools, for using his own 
peculiar names. 

Usually the theorem of the conservation of work is 
expressed in two forms: 

1. \1.inv^—\ZmVo^^-('^{Xdx^-Ydy-\-Zdz)\ or 

2. It is impossible to create work out of nothing, or to con- 
struct a Perpetuum mobile, 

19 



/^ 



I 



vi «^ 

Xj^' \> 20 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

\>: This theorem is usually considered as the flower of 

^ ^ the mechanical view of the world, as the highest and 

v^'^ most general theorem of natural science, to which the 

thought of many centuries has led. 

I will now try to show: 

Firstly, that this theorem, in the second form, is by 
no means so new as one tends to believe; that, indeed, 
almost all eminent investigators had a more or less 
confused idea of it, and since the time of Stevinus and 
Galileo, it has served as the foundation of the most 
important extensions of the physical sciences. 

Secondly, that this theorem by no means stands and 
falls with the mechanical view of the world, but that 
its logical root is incomparably deeper in our mind than 
that view. 

In the first place, as for the first part of my assertion, 
the proof must be drawn from original sources. Al- 
though, now, Lagrange, in his celebrated historical 
introductions to the sections of the Micaniqus analy- 
tique/ repeatedly refers to the development of our 
theorem, one soon finds, if one takes the trouble to con- 
sult the originals themselves, that in his exposition this 
theorem does not play the part which it played in fact. 

Although, now, the following facts, with the exception 
of a few, coincide with those mentioned by Lagrange, 
we derive from the important passages, given in extenso, 
another view than that which is found in Lagrange's 
work. 

I [The first edition of this work was published at Paris in 1788 
(i vol.) under the title Michanique analitique, the second at Pari% 
1811-1813 (2 vols.)i the third (ed. J. Bertrand), 1853, and the fourth 
{(Euvres, XI, XII, ed. G. Darboux), 1892.] 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



21 




Let me emphasize only some points: 

Simon Stevinus, in his work Hypomnemata mathe- 
matical Tom. IV, De statica, of 1605,* treats of the 
equilibrium of bodies on inclined planes. 

Over a triangular prism ABC, one side of which, 
A C, is horizontal, an endless cord or chain is slung, 
to which at equal distances 
apart fourteen balls of 
equal weight are attached, 
as represented in cross- 
section in Fig. I. Since 
we can imagine the lower 
symmetrical part of the 
cord ABC taken away, 
Stevinus concludes that 
the four balls on ABhs>\A 
in equilibrium the two balls on BC, For if t ] 
rium were fora momenf3isfürbed, it could never subsist: 
the cord would keep moving round forever in the same 
direction — we should h ave a perpetji aUnotion. He says: 

But if this took place, our row or ring of balls would come 
once more into their original position, and from the same cause 
the eight globes to the left would again be heavier than the six 
to the right, and therefore those eight would sink a second time 
and these six rise, and all the globes would keep up, of them~ 
selves, a continuous and unending motion^ which is falseJ 

« Leiden, 1605, p.. 34. [According to Moritz Cantor {Vorlesungen 
über Geschichte der Maihematiky II, 2. Aufl., Leipzig, 1900, p. 573), 
this work was first published in 1586, and a Latin translation, by 
Snellius, appeared in 1608. Cf. also Cantor, ibid., pp. 576-577.] 

3 " Atqui hoc si sit, globorum series sive corona eundem situm 
cum priore habebit, eademque de causa octo globi sinistri pondero- 



(/ 



22 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



loui- b^ 



. U 






\\y*^ 



1\aC/V 



^Vo^^ 



Fig. 2. 



\\^'^^ 



\c 



\ 



yJL 



Stevinus, now, easily derives from this principle 

jvithe laws of equilibrium on the inclined plane and nu- 

l^merous other fruitful consequences. 

In the chapter "Hydrostatics" of the same work, 

p. 114, Stevinus sets up the following principle: 

"Aquam datam, datum sibi intra aquam locum ser- 

vare" — a giveiwnassofwater preserves within jgater 

its given place. This principle is demonstrated as 

follows (see t'ig. 2) : 

For, assuming it to be possible by natural 
means, let us suppose that A does not preserve 
the place assigned to it, but sinks down to D. 
This being posited, the water which succeeds 
A will, for the same reason, also flow down to 
D; A will be forced out of its place in D; 

I and thus this body of water, for the conditions 
in it are ever3rwhere the same, will set up a 
perpetual motion, which is absurd.^ 

I From this all the principles of hydrostatics are de- 
/duced. On this occasion Stevinus also first develops 
the thought so fruitful for modem analytical mechanics 
that the equilibrium of a system is not destroyed by 
the addition of rigid connexions. As we know, the 
principle of the conservation of the centre of gravity is 
now sometimes deduced from d'Alembert's principle 

siores erunt sex dextris, ideoque rursus octo illi descendant, sex illi 
ascendent, istique globi ex sese continuum et aeternum motunt efficient, 
quod est falsum" 

4 "A igitur (si ullo mode per naturam fieri possit), locum sibi 
tributum non servato, ac delabatur in D; quibus positis aqua quae 
ipsi A succedit eandem ob causam deffluet in Z>, eademque ab alia 
istinc expelletur, atque adeo aqua haec (cum ubique eadem ratio sit) 
motum instituet perpetuum, quod absurdum fuerit.'* 




\Gr^ 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 23 

with the help of that remark. If we were to repro- 
duce Stevinus's demonstration to-day, we should havei 
to change it slightly. We find no difficulty injm agin- I ^ 

ing t he cord on the prism pu ii.'idiiii^jl Jif \\\\\ iu1in|j (Ifli kDv>^^* V^V -t^ 
for na motion, if ji U hindrap^n nro thn ii j i l . i il i j, li i l t \ /vvv_ofi>-^ 
we should protest against the assumption of an accel- cL^^^ ^^ 
erated motion or even against that of a uniform mo- » x- K^eA<. 
tion, if the resistances were not removed. Moreover, ^^a^^^ ^ '^nV 
for greater precision of proof, the string of balls might 1 

be replaced by a heavy homogeneous cord of infinite ^ v ^ ' ^ 
flexibility. But all this does not aflfect in the least the 
historical value of Stevinus's thoughts. It is a fact 
that Stevinus deduces apparently much simpler truths 
from the principle of an impossible perpetual motion. 

In the process of thought which led Galileo to his 
discoveries at the end of the sixteenth century, the fol- 
lowing principle plays an important part : that a body f-- \ \ 
in virtue of the velocity acquired in its descent can "^ 
rise exactly as high as it fell. This principle, which ' ^ . 
appears frequently and with much clearness in Galileo's ^ | 

thought, is simply another form of the principle of ^ | ^ J 
excluded perpetual motion, as we shall see it is also 
with Huygens. 

Galileo, as we know, arrived at the law of uniformly 
a ccelerated m otion by a priori consideratioiST^ais^Ehät 
law which was the "simplest and most natural," after 
having first assumed a different law which he was 
compelled to reject. To verify his law he performed 
experiments with falling bodies on inclined planes, 
measuring the times of descent by the weights of the 
water which flowed out of a small orifice in a large 



ii 






24 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 






^^ 



\t 



j^ 



vessel. In this experiment he assumes, as a fundamental 
principle, that the velocity acquired in descent down an 
inclined plane always colrespondajoJheverticaJ^^ 
descended through, a conclusion which for him isTKe~ 
immediate outcome of th'e^actTHat a body which has 
fallen down one inclined plane can, with the velocity it 
has acquired, rise on another plane of any inclination 
only to the same vertical height. This principle of 
the height of ascent also led him, as it seems, to the 
law of inertia. Let us hear his own masterly words 
in the Dialogo terzo {Opere, Padova, 1744, Tom. III). 
On page 96 we read: 

I take it for granted that the velocities acquired by a body 
in descent down planes of different inclinations are equal if the 
heights of those planes are equal. ^ 

Then he makes Salviati say in the dialogue:^ 

What you say seems very probable, but I wish to go farther 
and by an experiment so to increase the probability of it that it 

5 "Accipio, gradus velocitatis ejusdem mobilis super diversas 
planorum inclinationes acquisitos time esse aequales, cum eorundem 
planorimi elevationes aequales sint." 

6"Voi molto probabilmente discorrete, ma oltre al veri simile 
voglio con una esperienza crescer tanto la probabilitä, che poco gli 
manchi all'agguagliarsi ad ima ben necessaria dimostrazione. Figura- 
tevi questo fogllo essere una parete eretta al orizzonte, e da un chiodo 
fitto in essa pendere una palla di piombo d'un'oncia, o due, sospesa 
dal sottil file A B lungo due, o tre braccia perpendicolare airorizzonte, 
e nella parete segnate una linea orizzontale D C segante a squadra il 
perpendicolo A B, il quale sia lontano dalla parete due dita in circa, 
trasferendo poi il file A B colla palla in A C, lasciata essa palla in 
libertk, la quale primieramente vedrete scendere descrivendo 
Tarco C B P, e di tanto trapassare il termine ß, che scorrendo per 
Tarco B D sormonter^ fino quasi alia segnata parallela C D, restando 
di per vernirvi per piccolissimo intervallo, toltogli il precisamente 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 25 

shall amount almost to absolute demonstration. Suppose this 
sheet of paper to be a vertical wall, and from a nail driven in it 
a ball of lead weighing two or three ounces to hang by a very 
fine thread A B four or five feet long. (Fig. 3.) On the wall 
mark a horizontal line D C perpendicular to the vertical A B, 

arrivarvi dairimpedimento dell'aria, e del file. Dal che* possiamo 
veracemente concludere, che rimpeto acquistato nel punto B dalla 
palla nello scendere per Parco C Bj fu tanto, che bastb a risospingersi 
per un simile arco BD alia medesima altezza; fatta, e piu volte 
reiterata cotale esperienza, voglio, che fiechiamo nella parete rasente 
al perpendicolo A B un chiodo come in E, owero in F, che sporga in 
fuori cinque, o sei dita, e questo acciocchb il filo A C tomando come 
prima a riportar la palla C per Tarco C B, giunta che ella sia in B^ 
inoppando il filo nel chiodo E, sia costretta a camminare per la circon- 
ferenza B G descritta intorno al centro £, dal che vedremo quello, 
che poträ far quel medesimo impeto, che dianzi concepizo nel mede- 
simo termine B, sospinse Tistesso mobile per Parco E D all'al- 
tezza dell'orizzontale CD, Ora, Signori, voi vedrete con gusto 
condursi la palla alPorizzontale nel punto G, e Tistesso accadere, 
I'intoppo si metesse piu basso, come in F, dove la palla descriverebbe 
Tarco B /, terminando sempre la sua salita precisamente nella linea 
C Df c quando I'intoppe del chiodo fusse tanto basso, che Tavanzo 
del filo sotto di lui non arivasse all'altezza di C Z> (il che accaderebbe, 
quando fusse piu vicino all punto B, che al segamento deW A B 
coirorizzontale C D), allora il filo cavalcherebbe il chiodo, e segli 
avolgerebbe intorno. Questa esperienza non lascia luogo di dubitare 
della veritä del supposto: imperocch^ essendo li due archi C B, D B 
equali e similmento posti, Tacquisto di momento fatto per la scesa 
nelParco C B,h i\ medesimo, che il fatto per la scesa delParco D B; 
ma il momento acquistato in B per Tarco C Bh potente a risospingere 
in su il medesimo mobile per Tarco B D; adimque anco il momento 
acquistato nella scesa D B h eguale a quello, che sospigne I'istesso 
mobile pel medesimo arco da 3 in Z?, sieche universalmente ogni 
momento acquistato per la scesa dun arco b eguale a quello, che 
pu6 far risalire I'istesso mobile pel medesimo arco: ma i momenti 
tutti che fanno risalire per tutti gli archi B D, B Gy B J sono eguali, 
poich^ son fatti dal istesso medesimo momento acquistato per la 
scesa C By come mostra I'esperienza: adunque tutti i momenti, che si 
acquistano per le scese negli archi D B, G B^ J B sono eguali." 



/ 



26 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



which latter ought to hang about two inches from the wall. If 
now the thread A B with the ball attached take the position A C 
and the ball be let go, you will see the ball first descend through 
the arc C B and passing beyond B rise through the arc B D almost 
to the level of the line CD, being prevented from reaching it 
exactly by the resistance of the air and the thread. From this 
we may truly conclude that its impetus at the point B^ acquired 
by its descent through the arc C B, is sufficient to urge it through 
a similar arc B D to the same height. Having performed this 
experiment and repeated it several times, let us drive in the wall, 

in the projection of the 
Pig. 3. vertical A B, as at £ or 

- at F, a nail five or six 

inches long, so that the 
thread A C, carrying as 
before the ball through 
the arc C5, at the 
moment it reaches the 
position A B, shall strike 
the nail £, and the ball 
be thus compelled to move 
up the arc B G described 
about E as centre. Then 
we shall see what the 
same impetus will here accomplish, acquired now as before 
at the same point 5, which then drove the same moving 
body through the sltc B D to the height of the horizontal C D. 
Now, gentlemen, you will be pleased to see the ball rise to the 
horizontal line at the point G, and the same thing also happen if the 
nail be placed lower as at F, in which case the ball would describe 
the arc B /, always terminating its ascent precisely at the line 
C D. If the nail be placed so low that the length of thread below it 
does not reach to the height oiCD (which would happen if F were 
nearer B than to the intersection oi AB with the horizontal C Z>), 
then the thread will wind itself about the nail. This experiment 
leaves no room for doubt as to the truth of the supposition. Foi 
as the two arcs CB, DB are equal and similarly situated, the 




CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 27 

momentum acquired in the descent of the arc C B is the same 
as that acquired in the descent of the sltcDB; but the momentum 
acquired at B by the descent through the arc C 5 is capable of 
driving up the same moving body through the arc B D; hence 
also the momentum acquired in the descent Z>^ is equal to that 
which drives the same moving body through the same arc from 
B to D, so that in general every momentum acquired in the 
descent of an arc is equal to that which causes the same moving 
body to ascend through the same arc; but all the momenta which 
cause the ascent of all the arcs BD, BGy BJ are equal since they 
are made by the same momentum acquired in the descent C B, 
as the experiment shows: therefore all the momenta acquired 
in the descent of the arcs DB, GB, JB are equal. 

The remark relative to the pendulum may be ap- 
plied to the inclined plane and leads to the law of in- 
ertia. We read on p. 124:^ 

It is plain now that a movable body, starting from rest at A 
and descending down the inclined plane A B, acquires a velocity 
proportional to the in- 
crement of its time: *ig«4. 

the velocity possessed •^« »^ 

at 5 is the greatest of 

the velocities acquired, 

and by its nature 

immutably impressed, 

provided all causes of new acceleration or retardation are taken 

away: I say acceleration, having in view its possible further 

progress along the plane extended; retardation, in view of the 

7 "Constat jam, quod mobile ex quiete in A descendens per A B, 
gradus acquirit velocitatis juxta temporis ipsius incrementum: 
gradum vero in B esse maximum acquisitorum, et suapte natura 
immutabiliter impressum, sublatis scilicet causis accelerationis novae, 
aut retardationis: accelerationis in quam, si adhuc super extenso 
piano ulterius progrederetur; retardationis vero, dum super planum 
acclive B C fit reflexio: in horizontali autem G H aeqiiabilis motus 
juxta gradum velocitatis ex i4 in B acquisitae in infinitum extenderetur. 




\ 



\ 



28 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

possibility of its being reversed and made to mount the ascend- 
ing plane BC. But in the horizontal plane GH its equable 
motion, according to its velocity as acquired in the descent from 
AtoB, will be continued ad infinitum, (Fig. 4.) 

Huygens, upon whose shoulders the mantle of Gali- 
leo fell, formed a sharper conception of the law of inertia 
and generalized the principle respecting the heights of 
ascent which was so fruitful in Galileo's hands. He 
employed this principle in the solution of the prob- 
lem of the centre of oscillation and was perfectly clear in 
the statement that the principle respecting the heights 
of ascent is identical with the principle of excluded 
perpetual motion. 

The following important passages then occur (Hu- 
genii, Horologium oscUlatoriutn, pars secundd). Hy- 
potheses: 

If gravity did not exist, nor the atmosphere obstruct the 
motions of bodies, a body would keep up forever the motion once 
impressed upon it, with equable velocity, in a straight line.* [See 
note I, p. 75.] 

In part four of the Horologium; De centro osciUa- 
tionis we read: 

If any number of weights be set in motion by the force of 
gravity, the common centre of gravity of the weights as a whole 
cannot possibly rise higher than the place which it occupied when 
the motion^began. 

That this hypothesis of ours may arouse no scruples, we 
will state that it simply means, what no one has ever denied, 
that heavy bodies do not move upwards, — ^And truly if the de- 
visers of the new machines who make such futile attempts to 

* "Si gravitas non esset, neque aer motui corporum ofiiceret, 
uQumquodque eorum, acceptum semel motum continuaturum veloci- 
täte aequabili, secundum lineam rectam." 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 29 

construct a perpetual motion would acquaint themselves with 
this principle, they would easily be brought to see their errors 
and to understand that the thing is utteriy impossible by mechani- 
cal means.9 

There is possibly a Jesuitical mental reservation 
contained in the words "mechanical means." One 
might be led to believe from them that Huygens held 
a non-mechanical perpetual motion as possible. 

The generalization of Galileo's principle is still 

more clearly put in Prop. IV of the same chapter: 

If a pendulum, composed of several weights, set in motion 
from rest, complete any part of its full oscillation, and from that 
point onwards, the individual weights, with their common con- 
nexions dissolved, change their acquired velocities upwards and 
ascend as far as they can, the common centre of gravity of all will 
be carried up to the same altitude with that which it occupied 
before the beginning of the oscillation. '° 

On this last principle, now, which is a generaliza- 
tion, applied to a system of masses (see note 2, p. 80), 

9 "Si pondera quotlibet, vi gravitatis suae, moveri incipiant; 
noQ posse centrum gravitatis ex ipsis compositae altius, quam ubi 
incipiente motu reperiebatur, ascendere. 

" Ipsa vero hypothesis nostra quominus scrupulum moveat, nihil 
aliud sibi velle ostendemus, quam quod nemo unquam negavit, 
gravia nempe sursum non ferri. — Et sane, si hac eadem uti scirent 
novonim openim machinatores, qui motum perpetuum irrito conatu 
moliimtur, facile suos ipsi errores deprehenderent, intelligerentque 
rem eam mechanica ratione baud quaquam possibilem esse." 

i<> "Si pendulum e pluribus ponder ibus compositiun, atque e 
quiete dimissum, partem quamcunque oscillationis integrae confecerit, 
atque inde porro intelligantur pondera ejus singula, relicto communi 
vinculo, celeritates acquisitas sursum convertere, ac quousque 
possunt ascendere; hoc facto centrum gravitatis ex omnibus com- 
positae, ad eandem altitudinem reversum erit, quam ante inceptam 
oscillationem obtinebat." 



/ 



30 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

of one of Galileo's ideas respecting a single mass, and 
which from Huygens's explanation we recognize as 
the principle of excluded perpetual motion, Huygens 
grounds his theory of the centre of oscillation. La- 
grange characterizes this principle as precarious and is 
rejoiced at James Bernoulli's successful attempt, in 
1681, to reduce the theory of the centre of oscillation 
to the laws of the lever, which appeared to him clearer. 
All the great inquirers of the seventeenth and eighteenth 
centuries broke a lance on this problem, and it led 
ultimately, in conjunction with the principle of virtual 
velocities, to the principle enunciated by d'Alembert in 
1743 in his Traits de dynamique, though previously 
employed in a somewhat different form by Euler and 
Hermann. 

Furthermore, the Huygenian principle respecting 
the heights of ascent became the foundation of the 
"law of the conservation of living force," as that was 
enunciated by John and Daniel Bernoulli and em- 
ployed with such signal success by the latter in his 
Hydrodynamics. The theorems of the BemouUis differ 
m form only from Lagrange's expression in the Ana- 
lytical Mechanics. 

The manner in which Torricelli reached his famous 
law of efflux for liquids leads again to our principle. 
Torricelli assumed that the liquid which flows out of 
the basal orifice of a vessel cannot by its velocity of 
efflux ascend to a greater height than its level in the 
vessel. 

Let us next consider a point which belongs to pure 
mechanics, the history of the principle of virttial mo- 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 31 

tiinisjijuifii'iuaLzidüdii^. This principle was not first 
enunciated, as is usually stated, and as Lagrange also 
asserts, by Galileo, but earlier, by Stevinus. In his 
Trochleostatica of the above-cited work, p. 172, he says: 

Observe that this axiom of statics holds good here: 

As the space of the body acting is to the space of the body 

acted upon, so is the power of the body acted upon to the power 

of the body acting." 

Galileo, as we know, recognized the truth of the 
principle in the consideration of the simple machines, 
and also deduced the laws of the equilibrium of liquids 
from it. 

Torricelli carried the principle back to the proper- 
ties of the centre of gravity. The condition control- 
ling equilibrium in a simple machine, in which power 
and load are represented by weights, is that the com- 
mon centre of gravity of the weights shall not sink. 
Conversely, if the centre of gravity cannot sink, equi- 
librium obtains, because heavy bodies of themselves 
do not move upwards. In this form the principle of 
virtual velocities is identical with Huygens's principle 
of the impossibility of a perpetual motion. 

John Bernoulli, in 1717, first perceived the imiversal 
impöiL uf the prineiple-of virtual movements for all 
systems; a discovery stated in a letter to Varignon. 
Finally, Lagrange gave a general demonstration of 
the principle and founded upon it his whole Analytical 
Mechanics, But this general demonstration is based 

** "Notato autem hie illud staticum axioma etiam locum habere: 
"Ut spatium agentis ad spatium patientis 
Sic potentia patientis ad potentiazn agentis/' 



1 



32 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

after all upon Huygens's and Torricelli's remarks. La- 
grange, as is known, conceived simple puUeys arranged 
in the directions of the forces of the system, passed a 
cord through these pulleys, and appended to its free 
extremity a weight which is a common measure of all 
the forces of the system. With no difficulty, now, the 
number of elements of each pulley may be so chosen 
that the forces in question shall be replaced by them. 
It is then clear that if the weight at the extremity can- 
not sink, equilibrium subsists, because heavy bodies 
cannot of themselves move upwards. If we do not go 
so far, but wish to abide by Torricelli's idea, we may 
conceive every individual force of the system replaced 
by a special weight suspended from a cord passing 
over a pulley in the direction of the force and attached 
at its point of application. Equilibrium subsists then 
when the common centre of gravity of all the weights 
together cannot sink. The fundamental supposition 
of this demonstration is plainly the impossibility of a 
perpetual motion. 

Lagrange tried in every way to supply a proof free 
from extraneous elements and fully satisfactory, but 
without complete success. Nor were his successors 
more fortunate. 

ThejjKhole of mechanics is thus based upon an 
idea, %hich, though- oinequi vocal, is yet unwonted and 
ftot coequal w ith the other principles and axioms of 
mechanics. Every student xrf mechanic's, at some stage 
of his progress, feels the uncomfortableness of this 

AT 

state of affairs; everyone wishes it removed; but sel- 
dom is the difficulty stated in words. Accordingly, the 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 33 

zealous pupil of the science is greatly rejoiced when he 
reads in a master like Poinsot {Thiorie gSn^ale de 
Viquüihre et du mouvement des systimes) the following 
passage, in which that author is giving his opinion of 
the Analytical Mechanics: 

In the meantime, because our attention in that work was 
first wholly engrossed with the consideration of its beautiful 
development of mechanics, which seemed to spring complete 
from a single formula, we naturally believed Üiat Ihfi sdence was . 
competedT^d^^FTf only~remainftd to R^h the dem o n st ration oL 
the pmicipleo f virtual veloci tieSt But that quest brought back 
all the diääcul8es that we had overcome by the principle itself. 
That law so general, wherein are mingled the vague and un- 
familiar ideas of infinitely small movements and of perturbations 
of equilibrium, only grew obscure upon examination; and the 
work of Lagrange suppl3dng nothing clearer than the march of 
analysis, we saw plainly that the clouds had appeared lifted from 
the course of mechanics only because they had, so to speak, 
been gathered at the very origin of that science. 

At bottom, a generaLdemonstralipn of the principle of virtual 
velocities -would be equivalent to the establishment of the whole 
of me^m^d^>pit^:Ttiffereiiit^Sis':"fof the^^ of a 

law^^^chembraces a whole sdence is neither more nor less 
than the reduction of that science to another law just as general, 
but evident, or at least more simple than the first, and which, 
consequently, would render that useless." 

" "Cependant, comme dans cet ouvrage on ne fut d'abord attentif 
qu'ä considerer ce beau developpement de la mecanique qui semblait- 
sortir tout enti^re d'une seule et m^me formule, on crut naturellement 
que la science ^tait faite, et qu'il ne restait plus qu'ä, chercher la de- 
monstration du principe des vitesses virtuelles. Mais cette recherche 
ramena toutes les difficult^ qu'on avait franchies par le principe 
m^me. Cette loi si gdndrale, oü se m^lent des id^ vagues et ^tran- 
gbres de mouvements infinement petits et de perturbation d'^quilibre, 
ne fit en quelque sorte que s'obsurcir h, Texamen; et le livre de 
Lagrange n'offränt plus alors rien de clair que la marche des calculs, 




34 CONSERVA TION OF ENERGY 

r According to Poinsot, therefore, a proof of the 
principle of virtual movements is tantamount to a 
total rehabilitation of mechanics. 

Another circumstance of discomfort to the mathe- 
matician is that, in the historical form in which me- 
chanics at present exists^^ynamics is found ed on 
tics, whg^aas-itis 'desirable that m a science which 
jiretclids to deductive completeness the more special 

r^ statical theorems should be deducible from the more 
general d3mamical principles. 

6<^^ v\aA^ ^^ ^^^*> ^ ^^^ master. Gauss, gave expression to 

I ^ Sr ^ this desire in his presentment of the principle of least 

\^^ tJfji, constraint (Crelle's Journal für reine und angewandte 
^^^y Mathematik^ Vol. IV, p. 233) in the following words: 
" Proper as it is that in the gradual development of a 
science, and in the instruction of individuals, lh£_fiasy 
should precede the difficuljt^-the-simpleLjhe complex, 
the special the gejaeraL^et^the mind^whcnncmce it has 
reached a higher point of view, demands the contrary 
Ij- course, in which all statics shall appear simply as a 
special case of mechanics." Gauss's own principle, 
now, possesses all the requisites of universality, but 
its difficulty is that it is not immediately intelligible, 



f-x 



\ 



on vit bien que les nuages n'avaient paru leve sur le cours de la 
mdcanique que parcequ'ils ^taient, pour ainsi dire, rassembl^s ^ 
I'origine m^me de cette science. 

**Une demonstration generale du principe des vitesses virtuelles 
devait au fond revenir a ^tablir le m^canique entibre sur une autre 
base: car la demonstration d'une loi qui embrasse toute ime science 
ne pent 6tre autre chose que la reduction de cette science ä ime autre 
loi aussi generale, mais Evidente, ou du moins plus simple que la 
premise, et qui partant la rende inutile" (Poinsot, Elements de 
staiigue, 10. ^d., Paris, 1861, pp. 263-264). 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 35 

and that Gauss deduced it with the help of d'Alem- 
bert's principle, a procedure which left matters where 
they were before. 

Whence, now, is derived this strange part which 
the principle of virtual motion plays in mechanics? 
For the present I shall only make this reply. It would 
be difl&cult for me to tell the difference of impression 
which Lagrange's proof of the principle made on me 
when I first took it up as a student and when I sub- 
sequently resumed it after having made historical re- 
searches. It first appeared to me insipid, chiefly on 
account of the pulleys and the cords which did not fit 
in with the mathematical view, and whose action I 
would much rather have discovered from the principle 
itself than have taken for granted. But now that I 
have studied the history of the science I cannot ima- 
gine a more beautiful demonstration. 

In fact, through all mechanics it is this selfsame 
principle of excluded perpetual motion which accom- 
plishes almost everything that displeased Lagrange, 
but which he still had to employ, at least tacitly, in his 
own demonstration. If we give this-principle its proper 
place and setting^the_4iära(iox i^ explained. 

Let us consider another department of physics, the 
theory of heat. 

S. Camot, in his Reflexions sur la puissance motrice 
du feu,^^ established the following theorem: Whenever 
work is performed by means of heat, a certain quantity 
of heat passes from a warmer to a colder body (sup- 
posing that a permanent alteration in the state of the 

13 Paris, 1824. [Cf. a note to p. 38 below.] 



^ 36 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



S* 






i 



acting body does not take place). To the performance 
?" of work corresponds a transference of heat. Inversely, 
^ with the same amoimt of the work obtained, one can 
^o again transfer the heat from the cooler body to the 
1 warmer one. Camot, now, found that the quantity of 
"^ heat flowing from the temperature / to the temperature 
^ /x, for a definite performance of work, cannot depend 
^ upon the chemical nature of the bodies in question, but 
^ only upon these temperatures. If not, a combination 
of bodies, which would continually generate work out 
of nothing, could be imagined. Here, then, An >im- 
portant discovery is founded on., .ibe- principle ^ of 
_^diided -peiyetual motion. This is without doubt 
the first extra-mechanical application of the theorem. 
Camot considered the quantity of heat as invariable. 
Clausius, now, found that with the performance of 
work, heat not merely flows over from / to /,, but also 
a part of it, which is always proportional to the work 
performed, is lost. By a continued application of 
the principle of excluded perpetual motion, he foimd 
that 

where Q denotes the quantity of heat transformed into 
work and Qi, that which flows from the absolute temper- 
ature T to the absolute temperature T^ . 



^'1 kS *^ Special weight has been laid on this vanishing of 

^ -Y :§ heat with the performance of work and the formation 

v5 -i» of heat with the expenditure of mechanical work — 



'^^ "^ which processes were confirmed by the considerations 

of J. R. Mayer, Helmholtz, and W. Thomson, and by 



^' 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 37 

the experiments of Rmnford, Joule, Favre, Silbermann, fP tct <vi 

and [many others. From this it was concluded that, if r^.^ o^ ^/ 

heat can be transformed into mechanical work, heat 4^«^^ 



'VA^tt 



i 



I 




consists in mechanical processes — in motion. This \ >^^ 
conclusion, which has spread over the whole cultivated 
world like wild-fire, had, as an effect, a huge mass of 
literature on this subject, and now people are every- \ z^^^, j:- . Ji 
where eagerly bent on explaining heat by means o£ --^s^Kt^^^ 

motions; they determine the velocities, the average dis- 
tances, and the paths of the molecules, and there is 
hardly: a single problem which could not, people say, 
be completdy solved in this way by means of sufficiently ^ k^^a^m.^ 
long calculations and of different hypotheses. No 
wonder that in all this clamour the voice of one of the 
most eminent, that of the great founder of the mechani- 
cal theory of heat, J. R. Mayer, is imheard: 

Just as littie as, from the connexion between the tendency ^Ls/i / c ^^^. 
to fall (Fallkraff) and motion, we catr cundudu Üu i the essence ^ 

of this tendo icy is mnfinn/ jmt n li ft lr don thin c nnrlininn hold C o\^ckio\^tAi2 
for heat. RalBCTHIfgirt we conclude the opposite, that, in order \ \ v/^ u G-t-^t^v-^ 
to become heat, motion-whether simple or vibrating, like light /yv^^,^^^ 
or radiant heat — must cease to be motion.'^ 

We will see later what is the cause of the vanishing 
of heat with the performance of work. 

The second extra-mechanical application of the 
theorem of excluded perpetual motion was made by 
Neumann for the analytical foundation of the laws of 
electrical induction. This is, perhaps, the most talented 
work of this kind. 

x4 Mechanik der Wärmen Stuttgart, 1867, p. 9. 



38 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

Finally, Helmholtz^^ attempted to cairy the law of 
the conservation of work through the whole of physics, 
. and, from this point onwards, the applications of this 
law to" the extension of science are innumerable. 

Helmholtz carried the principle through in two ways. 
We can, said he, set out from the fimdamental theorem 
that work cannot be created out of nothing, and thereby 
bring physical phenomena into connexion, or we can 
consider physical processes as molecular processes which 
are produced by central forces alone — thus by forces 
which have a potential. For the latter processes, the 

's [A convenient edition of H. Helmholtz*s paper Ueher die Erhal- 
tung der Krajt of 1847, together with the notes that Helmholtz himself 
added to its reprint in his Wissenschaftliche Abhandlungen (Vol. I, pp. 
12-75), ^ *^^^ ^^ N^* ^ °^ Ostwald's Klassiker der exakten Wissen- 
schaften. This same series of Klassiker "also includes, in German 
translations, and with notes that are often valuable, the following 
works, which are referred to by Mach in the present work: Galileo's 
Discorsi (notes by Arthur voni2tettingen), Nr. 1 1, 24, and 25 ; Camot's 
work of 1824 (notes by W. Ostwald), Nr. 37; F. E. Neumann's 
papers on induced electric cvirrents (notes by C. Neumann), Nr. 10 
and 36; Clausius's paper of 1850 on thermodynamics (notes by M. 
Planck), Nr. 99; and Coulomb's papers on the torsion balance (notes 
by Walter König), Nr. 13. In the same series are some papers of 
Helmholtz and Kirchhoff on thermodynamics (notes by M. Planck) 
in Nr. 124 and loi respectively; and Huygens's Traiti de la lumihre 
of 1678, in which certain views as to mechanical physics (cf. Mach, 
Pop, Sei, Lect.f 3d ed.. Open Court Publishing Co., Chicago, 1898, 
pp. 155-156) are given, is annotated by E. Lommel and A. von 
Oettingen in Nr. 20. 

We may also add here that Clausius's papers on thermodynamics 
have been translated into English by W. R. Browne (The Mechanical 
Theory of Heat by R, Clausius, London, 1879; reviewed in Nature, 
February 19, 1880. The German edition was published in Braun- 
schweig, 3 vols., Vol. I, 3d ed., 1887, Vol. II, 2d ed., 1879, Vol. Ill, 
2d ed., 1889-91).] 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 39 

• 

mechanical law of the conservation of work, in La- 
grange's form, of course holds. 

As regards the first thought, we must regard it as an 
important one as containing the generalization of the 
attempts of Camot, Mayer, and Neumann to apply the 
principle outside mechanics. Only we must combat 
the view, to which Helmholtz inclined, that the principle [l^ p>riw>u*^ 
first came to be accepted through the development of J J._AJbü ^ 
mechanics. In fact, it is older than the whole of t^^r<J>^ x, 

mechanics. _ ^ ^^iXl 

This view, now, seems to have been the leading Ö 

motive in occasioning the second manner of treatment, 
against which, as I hope to show, very much can be 
urged. 

However this may be, the view that physical phenom- 
ena can be reduced to processes of motion and equilib- ^ 
rium of molecules is so universally spread that, at the , ^«^T^^ 
present time, one can only let people know that one's "^^ Av^ 
convictions are opposed to it, with caution, guardedly, cr^ 
and at the risk of rousing the opinion that one is not v ^^>. JjC 
up to date and has not grasped the trend of modem ^' 
culture. 

To illustrate this point, I will quote a passage from 
a tract of 1866 on the physical axioms by Wundt,^^ for 
Wundt is a representative of the modem natural scien- 
tific tendency, and his way of thinking is probably that 
of a great majority of the investigators of natural science. 
Wundt lays down the following axioms: 

I. All causes in nature are motional causes. 

16 ])ie physikalischen Axiome und ihre Beziehungen zum Kausal- 
principe Erlangen, 1866. 



-T^ 






■^ 



tM ' '^^^ 



40 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

2. Every motional cause lies outside the object 
moved. 

3. All motional causes act in the direction of the 
straight line of junction, and so on. 

4. The effect of every cause persists. 

5. To every effect corresponds an equal counter- 
effect. 

XK, I 1; . 6. Every effect is equivalent to its cause. 

Thus, there is no doubt that here all phenomena are 
[\\\ nVir^^ATtf'^i^'^ thought of as a sum of mechanical events. And, so far 

^'"^L ''•'a.ta^^ di ^ ^ know, no objection has been raised to Wimdt's 

t g view. Now, however valuable Wundt's work may be 
. in so far as it relates to mechanics, especially for what 

concerns the derivation of the axioms, and however 
5k'^'' much it agrees in that with the thoughts which I 

have held for many years, I can regard his theorems 
as mechanical only and not as physical. I will return 
to this question later. 

Thus we have seen, in this historical sketch of many 

—•IS» 

IV* (x»^<^|» Icenturies, that our principle of the conservation of work 

^^ ' ,,- v^^^«^^^ pas played a great part as an instrument of research. 

'^^•~v«A ^ ^^^ second theorem of excluded perpetual motion was 

. ^^ \ always leading to the discovery of mechanical — and 

V^" ^' ^^^ ^^^^ other physical — truths, and can also be considered 

c/^ ^(\^^^^ ^^ ^^^ historical foimdation of the first theorem. On 

\^^^Zj^ the other hand, the attempt to regard the whole of 

^^ÄT V- 4 physics as mechanics and to make the first theorem the 

^ Cx foundation of the second, or to extend the first to the 

V ^ second, is not capable of being misunderstood. Now, 

^ s^^"^ . this circle is objectionable and rouses one's suspicions. 

A ^ >^ ^ ^ It calls urgently for an investigation. 



\ 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



41 



In the first place it is clear that the principle of 
excluded perpetual motion cannot be founded on 
mechanics, since its validity was felt long before the 
:e of mechanics was raised. The42xinciple-mugt 
h^v e^ another fo undation. This view will now be sup- 
ported if, on closer consideration of the mechanical 
conception of physics, we find that the latter sufifers"^ 
from being a doubtful anticipation and from one-sided- 
ness, neither of which accusations can be laid against 
our principle. We wiU, then, firstjiL-aUpexamine the 
mechanical view of nature, in order to prove that the 
said principle is indepSdenfTjfit: 






i 



-I 






\ 



i^< > 



v^ 4~,.( 



.A 



<4 "^ 



\- 



k 'vyvf J» 



\A^- 



rr.ck 



f 






s.« 



<C\t^Jf V 



o»< 






^ *^^ \A^oVr r. 




/>A^<L 



-^ 






^fc'"^ 



III 

MECHANICAL PHYSICS 

THE attempt to extend the mechanical theorem of 
the conservation of work to the theorem of 



K.C ^^ excluded perpetual motion is connected with the rise of 

> ^"^ o^^^ the mechanical conceptions of nature, which again was 

/d /r \ I especially stimulated by the progress of the mechanical 

\j U theory of heat. Let us, then, glan ce at th e theory of 

-^W^y^ The modem mechanical theory of heat and its view 

that heat is motion principally rest on the fact that the 
qij^ntity of heat present decreases in the measure that 

V . V work is used, provided that this work does not appear 

^j^ in another form. I say the modem theory of heat, for 

\>^ it is well known that the explanation of heat by means 

of motion had already jnore than once jbeen- given a nd 
'^-'^ lost sight of. 

If, now, people say, heat vanishes in the measure that 
it performs work, it cannot be material, and conse- 
quently mus4 be motion. 

S. Camot found that whenever heat performs work, 

, a certain quantity of heat goes from a higher tempera- 

yP vV" -r " ture-level to a lower one. He supposed in this that the 

^ r^,^ y quantity of heat remains constant. A simple analogy 

^ ^ r is this: If water (say, by means of a water-mill) is to 

perform work, a certain quantity of it must flow from a 




42 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 43 

higher to a lower level; the quantity of water remains 
constant during the process. 

When wood swells with dampness, it can perform 
work, burst open rocks, for example; and some people, 
as the ancient Egyptians, have used it for that purpose. 
Now, it would have been easy for an Egyptian wiseacre 
to have set up a mechanical theory of humidity. If 
wetness is to do work, it must go from a wetter body to 
one less wet. Evidently the wiseacre could have added 
that the quantity of wetness remains constant. 

Electricity can perform work when it flows from a 
body of higher potential to one of lower potential; the 
quantity of the electricity remains constant. 

A body in motion can perform work if it transfers 
some of its vis viva to a body moving more slowly. Vis 
viva can perform work by passing from a higher 
velocity-level to a lower one; the vis viva then de- 
creases. 

It would not be difficult to produce such an analogy 
from every branch of physics. I have intentionally 
chosen_JJxe-4asty- because complete ' analegy:. Jireaks^ 
down. 

When Clausius brought Camot's theorem into con- 
nexion with the reflexions and experiments of Mayer, 
Joule, and others, he found that the addition "the (^ -^ 
quantity of heat remains constant" must be given up. \ 

One must, on the other hand, say that a quantity >of ^ «*-^^ 
heat proportional JXL the -work^erformed vanishes. ^V v ^ 

"The quantity of water remains constant while ^""^ f ^\ 

work is performed, because it is a substance. The 
-quantity of heat varies because it is not a substance," 



44 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

These two statements will appear satisfactory to 
most scientific investigators; and yet both are quite 
J worthless and signify nothing. 

We will make this clear by the following question 

which bright students have sometimes put to me. Is 

there a mechanical equivalent of electricity as there is 

V Jfi a mechanical equivalent of heat ? Yes, and no. There 

Ut^^^*- c^ is no mechanical equivalent of quantity of electricity 

y^^V » . \las there is an equivalent of quantity of heat, because 

^ N^'"^^"^ cKvJ'* I »the same qii antity of electricity ha^a very d iflFerent 

^,>>V^^s/-^V capacityTorwork, according to the circum stanc es in 

"" vZ ^ ^ ^^^^ r ^^^^'^ ^^ ^ placed ; but there'fra mechanical equivalent 

i}'^ v\ I of electrical energy. 
V >^ >:>^ ^ Let us ask another question. Is there a mechanical 



4S 



> 



9/^ %r -^^ equivalent of water ? No, there is no mechanical equiv- 

^ V/ alent of quantity of water, but there is a mechanical 

^ I equivalent of weight of water multiplied by its distance 

J \ of descent. 

When a Leyden jar is discharged and work thereby 

performed, we do not picture to ourselves that the 

[^ ^"^4^ ^ quantity of electricity disappears as work is done, but 

•/'^x Ov^ we simply assume that the electricities come into dif- 

d\*7 ^ ferent positions, equal quantities of positive and nega- 

?ß^ tive electricity being united with one another. 

What, now, is the reason of this difference of view 

in our treatment of heat and of electricity? The 

nj^^ ^Q^reason is purely historical, wholly conventional, and, 

\Va , Uqa>^ what is still more important, is wholly indifferent. I 



/■ 



V^-W 



w \ »^ ^^ may be allowed to establish this assertion. 
\3^P^ ^ In 1785 Coulomb constructed his torsion balance, 

{ ^^ o-^ '^y which he was enabled to measure the repulsion of^ 









CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 45 

electrified bodies. Suppose we have two small balls, 

Af By which over their whole extent are similarly 

electrified. These two balls will exert on one another, 

at a certain distance r of their centres from one another, 

a certain repulsion p. We bring into contact with 5, 

now, a ball C, suffer both to be equally electrified, and 

then measure the repulsion of B from A and of C from A 

at the same distance r. The sum of these repulsions is J,^j^ iG V^*^ 

again ^. Accordingly something has remained constant, a^^^^ v^Jl- 

If we ascribe this effect to a substance, then we infer ^^^ Vva 

naturally its constancy. But the essential point of the <^wJo^^^*^'^'''"'^^ 

exposjtion is the divisibility of the electric force p and 

not the^sintäe-of Substance. 

In 1838 Riess constructed his electrical air-thermom- 
eter (the thermoelectrometer). This gives a measure 
of the quantity of heat produced by the discharge of 
jars. This quantity of heat is not proportional to the 
quantity of electricity contained in the jar by Cou- 
lomb's measure, but if 3 be this quantity and .^ be 
the capacity, is proportional to q^/Sj or, more simply 
still, to the energy of the charged jar. If, now, we 
discharge the jar completely through the thermometer, 
we obtain a certain quantity of heat, W. But if we 
make the discharge through the thermometer into a 
second jar, we obtain a quantity less than W. But we 
may obtain the remainder by completely discharging 
both jars through the air-thermometer, when it will 
again be.proportional to the energy of the two jars. On 
the fir|St, incomplete discharge, accordingly, a part of 
the electricity's capacity for work was lost. 

WHen the charge of a jar produces heat, its energy 



46 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

is changed and its value by Riess's thermometer is 
decreased. But by Coulomb's measure the quantity 
remains unaltered. 

o \ o'^^^^'Aa Xt:^ ^^^ ^^^ ^^ imagine that Riess's thermometer had 

* £ ^ 9yV^ been invented before Coulomb's torsion balance, which 

^^/^ is not a difficult feat of imagination, since both inven- 

^v^ <^ j/tions are independent of each other; what would be 

^ ^\ '^ ^f more natural than that the "quantity" of electricity 

V ^ c^'vb contained in a jar should be measured by the heat 

Qr^ . Q\r^ produced in the thermometer? But then, this so- 

^ ^^ ^ o^ <^ called quantity of electricity would decrease on the 



^^' 



^>. 



^ A/ v>^ \ "production of heat or on the performance of work, 
^^s^ V , I therefore, electricity would not be a substance but a 



L<^ ,^^i^ ^ \ whereas it now remains imchanged; in the first case, 



V^ ^s^ . Imotiofiy whereas now it is still a substance. ThS' 

"^ r^ X^ reason, therefore, why we have other notions of elec- 

N^^ ^ * tricity than we have of heat, is purely historical, acci- 

/ST dental, and conventional. ^ 

^"^ This is also the case with other physical things. 

Water does not disappear when work is done. Why ? 

Because we measure quantity of water with scales, just 

as we do electricity. But suppose the capacity; 

X waiter for work were called quantity, and had to be 

TW ^*a>'^^''^ * measured7~Thereförer-fey ä"mill instead of by scales; 

^^x^l-'^jp^of*^^ then this quantity also , would: -disappear as it per- 

w ^. ,\ '\ formed the work. ""^ It may, now, be easily conceived 

^^ ^ ^ ^- \ ^y" ^thftt-4a€my"substances are not so easily got at as water. 

. ^v' ' *^^ \r In that case we should be unable to carry out the one 

X «,.^^ x^ I kind of measurement with the scales while many other 

' ■ ^ ' ^ "^ k^ modes of measurement would still be left us. 

"^ t^ Äfc *" ^^ ^^^ ^^^^ ^^ hedit, now, the historically established 









CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 47 

ire of " quantity^ is accidentally the work- value 
of the heat. Accordingly, its quantity disappears when 

work is done. But tjiat heat i> r^Qt ^ ^^nbstanre follows 

from this as little as does the opposite conclusion that 
it is a substance. In Black^s case the quantity of heat 
rfemal^ constant because the heat passes into no other \ 
form of energy. ' 

If anyone to-day should still wish to think of heat 
as a substance, we might allow that person this liberty 
with little ado. He would only have to assume that 
that which we call quantity of heat was the energy of 
^ substance whose quantity remained unaltered, but 
whose energy changed. In point of fact we might 
much better say, in analogy with the other terms of 
physics, energy of heat^Jnstfiad-of-quafifity of heat. 

By means ot thisreflection, the pe culiar character 
of the second principal theorem of the mechanical 
theory of heat quite vanishes, and I have shown ii^ 
another place that we can at once apply it to electrical 
and other phenomena if we put "potential" instead of 
"quantity of heat" and "potential function" instead of 
"absolute temperature." (See note 3, p. 85.) 

If, then, we are astonished at the discovery that heat 
is motion, we are astonished at something which has 
never been discovered. It is quite irrelevant for 
scientific purposes whether we think of heat as a sub- 
stance or not. 

If a physicist wished to deceive himself by means of 
the notation that he himself has chosen — ^a state of things 
which cannot be supposed to be — he would behave 
similarly to many musicians who, after they have long 



N 



48 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



>. -J 



.«."5 



f 



w 



UJ. 



^ \> v> 



N- .-y 



v.^ <.-• 



vr 






^ 



forgotten how musical notation and softened pitch arose, 
are actually of the opinion that a piece marked in the 
key of six flats (Gb) must soimd differently from one 
marked in the key of six sharps (F^). 

If it were not too much for the patience of scientific 
V- people, one could easily make good the following state- 
ment. I|eat is a su bstance just as much as oxygen is, 
andjtis not a sulSstance ju st as little a so3^gefi. Sub- 
fstance is possible phenomenon, a convenient word for a 
* gap in our thoughts. 

' To us investigators, the concept "soul" is irrelevant 

and a matter for laughter. But matter is an abstraction 

"of exactly the same kind, just as good and just as bad 

,as it is. We know as much about the soul as we do of 

I Imatter. 

If we explode a mixture of oxygen and hydrogen in 
an eudiometer-tube, the phenomena of oxygen and 
hydrogen vanish and are replaced by those of water. 
We, say, now, that water consists of oxygen and hydro- 
gen; but this oxygen and this hydrogen are merely two 
thoughts or names which, at the sight of water, we keep 
ready, to describe phenomena which are not present, 
but which will appear again whenever, as we say, we 
decompose water. 

It is just the same case with oxygen as with latent 
heat. Both can appear when, at the moment, they 
cannot yet be remarked. If latent heat is not a sub- 
stance, oxygen need not be one. 

The indestructibility and conservation of matter 
cannot be urged against me. Let us rather say con- 
servation of weight; then we have a pure fact, and we 







CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 49 

see at once that it has nothing to do with any theory. 
This cannot here be carried out any farther. 

One thing we maintain, and that is, that in the ^^j^^U^ 
inv^stigatioBr-e f nalm e , we have t o deal only w it h 
knowledge of the connexionof appearagces-wth one 
another. What we represent to ourselves behind the 
appearances exists only in our understanding, and has 
for us only the value of a memoria technica or formula, 
whose form, because it is arbitrary and irrelevant, varies 
very easily with the standpoint of our culture. 

If, now, we merely keep our hold on the new laws / 

as to the connexion between heat and work, it does not '^ f { / r c 
matter how we think of heat itself; and similarly in all '^ ' 1 1 * 
physics. This way of presentation does not alter the i 

facts in the least. But if this way of presentation is c ov^^" ^^' 
so limited and inflexible that it no longer allows us to 
follow the many-sidedness of phenomena, it should not ^\^ \juca>-^ 
be used any more as a formula and will begin to be a ^ ^. ,«, ^.J - 
hindrance to us in the knowledge of phenomena. "^ ,^, v. -^ 

This happens, I think, in the mechanical conception 
of physics. Let us glance at this conception that all 
physical phenojnena reduce, to tbe--eqiillibrium and 
movement ofjaolecules and atoms. 

Äccofdingto Wimdt, all changes of nature are mere 
changes of place. All causes are motional causes.'^ 
Any discussion of the philosophical groimds on which 
Wimdt supports his theory would lead us deep into 
the speculations of the Eleatics and the Herbartians. 
Change of place, Wundt holds, is the only change 
of a thing in which a thing remains identical with 

«7 Op. cU,, p. 26. 



^'^H. 



I • -^ 






^ 






*-? 



^ "^ 50 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

^ "^ itself. If a thing changed qualitativdy, we should 

" ^ be obliged to imagine that something was annihilated 

^ and something else created in its place, which is not to 

V -O be reconciled with our idea of the identity of the object 

''<■ observed and of the indestructibility of matter. But 

- we have only to remember that the Eleatics encoimtered 

' ^ difficulties of exactly the same sort in motion. Can we 

^ ^- not also imagine that a thing is destroyed in one place 

and in another an exactly similar thing created ? 

It is a bad sign for the mechanical view of the 
world that it wishes to support itself on such prepos- 
terous things, which are thousands of years old. If the 
ideas of matter, which were made at a lower stage of 
r) ^ ^ culture, are not suitable for dealing with the phenomena 

1 >;^ accessible to those on a higher plane of knowledge, it 

follows for the true investigator of nature that these 
ideas must be given up; not that jfflly those phenomena 
exist, for which ideas that are_out_ofjorderandjiavebeen 
outlived are^suited. 

But let us suppose for a moment that all physical 

^ events can be reduced to spatial motions of material 

^k c^T ^ ^ ^'^cr-^ particles (molecules). What can we do with that sup- 

..NtC^'^ \ vS position? Thereby we suppose that things which 

ji^^v^^ ,. / ^ can never be seen or touched and only exist in our 



•or- 



\ 



^ \ I "^ imagination and understanding, can have the proper- 

\\V^ tifis^AnfJ^t^ektinr^R on1y_nf things whjrh^fln he tnnrhftH. 

' j ^y^ ' - ^ \ ^^ impose on the creations ^Ihought the limitations 
^- \ ,\ - J I of the visible and tangible. 

^V'^^ Now, there are also other forms of perception of 

other senses, and these forms are perfectly analogous to 
' space— for example, the tone-series for hearing, which 



X 



n: 



*" 
V ♦. ^ 



\ 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



SI 



r corresponds to a space of one dimension — ^and we do 
^ not allow ourselves a like liberty with them. We do not 
think of all things as sounding and do not figure to 
ourselves molecular events musically, in relations of 
heights of tones, although we are as justified in doing 
this as in thinking of them spatially. 

This, therefore, teaches us what an unnecessary 
restriction we here impose upon ourselves. There is no 
more necessity to think of what is merely a product of 
thought spatially, that is to say, with the relations of 
the visible and tangible, than there is to think of these 
things in a definite position in the scale of tones. 

And I will immediately show the sort of drawback 
that this limitation has. A system of n points is in 
form and magnitude determined in a space of r dimen- 
sions, if e distances between pairs of points are given, 
where e is given by the following table: 



r 

A • • •••••• 

^ •••■■•■•••• 

3 

4 

5 

f 






rn- 



n — i 

3n-6 
4n— lo 

r{r-\-i) 



2»-3 
3n-6 
4»— lo 

6» — 21 



(r+i)n- 



(r + i) (r+2) 



/ 



C c V 



^. 



r. J in 






^ 



\, 



J 



/ 



\ 



In this table, the column marked by e^ is to be used 
f or ß if we have made conditions about the seflseoTthe 
given distances, for example, that in the straight line all 
points are reckoned according to one direction; in the 
plane all towards one side of the straight line through the 
first two points ; in space all towards one side of the plane 



?*- - J ■ 



? - 



^^ 




52 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

through the first three pomts; and so on. The coliunn 
marked by e^ is to be used if merely the absolute magni- 
tude of the distance is given. 

Between n points, combining them in pairs, ^^^^i^ 

X • 2 

distances are thinkable, and therefore in general more 

than a space of a given number of dimensions can 

vsatisfy. If, for example, we suppose the ^^-column to 

k Q ^ ^ be the one to be used, we find in a space of r dimen- 

\^ ^ V '■' cV sions the difference between the number of thinkable 







.9 



* ^ ^ \ '' distances and those possible in this space to be 



A 



\ 



or 

n(n— i)— 2r»+r(fH-i)=2Ä, 

which can be brought to the form 

(r—n) * + (f — «) = 2k, 

This difiPerence is, now, zero, if 

\ ' ^ (f— «)'+(f— «)=o, or (r— n)+i=o, or n=r+i. 

For a space of three dimensions, the number of 
distances thinkable is greater than the niunber of 
distances possible in this space when the number of 
points is greater than four. Let us imagine, for 
example, a molecule consisting of five atoms, A, By 
C, D, and E, then between them, ten distances are 
thinkable, but, in a space of three dimensions, only 
nine are possible, that is to say, if we choose nine such 
distances, the tenth thinkable one is determined by 
means of the nature of this space, and it is no longer 
arbitrary, li A B, BC, CA, AD, D B, D C, are 
given me, I get a tetrahedron of fixed form. If, now, 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



53 




I add E with the distances E A, EBj and EC deter- 
mined, then D E is determined by them. Thus it 
would be impossible gradually to 
alter the distance D E without the 
other distances being thereby al- 
tered. Thus, there might be 
serious difficulties in the way of 
imagining many pent-atomic iso- 
meric molecules which merely differ 
from one another by the relation 
of D and E. This difficulty van- 
ishes in our example, when we 
think the pent-atomic molecule in a space of four dimen- 
sions; then ten independent distances are thinkable 
and also ten distances can be set up. 

Now, the greater the number of atoms in a molecule, 
the higher the number of the dimensions of space do we 
need to make actual all the thinkable possibilities of 
such combinations. This is only an example to show 
linder what limitations we proceed when we imagine 
-the rhejni cal elgnents jying s ide by si^ in a opace of 
three dimensio ns, and ho w_a crowJof t he r elations of 
the elefl lCTitscan escape us thereby if we wish to repre- 
sent them in a formula which cannot comprise them. 
(See note 4, p. 86.) 

It is clear how we can study the nature of chemical 
combinations without giving ourselyes up to the con- 
ception mentioned, and how, indeed, people have now 
begxm to study them. The heat of combustion gen- 
erated by a combination gives us a clearer idea of the 
stability and manner of combination than any pictorial 



.; 



»-^- 






^A 



i.^ 






■\ 



\ '■ 






54 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

representation. If, then, it were possible, in any mole- 
cule composed of » parts, to determine the — ^^ 

heats of combination of every two parts, the nature 
of the combination would be characterized thereby. 
According to this view, we would have to determine 



,\ 



heats of combination, whereas, if the molecules 

V" ^* \ were thought spatially, 3»— 6 heats of combination 

\ V. '^ suffice. Perhaps, too, a more rational manner of 

'v^ > writing chemical combinations can be founded on this. 

We would write the components in a circle, draw a line 
from each to each, and write on the latter the respective 
heat of combination. 

Perhaps the reason why, hitherto, people have not 

succeeded in establishing a satisfactory theory of 

p^ectricity is because they wished to explain electrical 

/ phenomena by means of molecular events in a space of 

^{,^^ three dimensions. 

Herewith I believe that I have shown that one can 
Id, treasure, and also turn to good account the results 
of modem natural science without being a supporter 
of the mechanical conception of nature, that this con- 
ception is not necessary for the knowledge of the 
phenomena and can be replaced just as well by another 
theory, and that the mechanical conceptions can even 
be a hindrance to the knowledge of phenomena. 

Let me add a view on scientific theories in general: 
If all the individual facts — all the individual phenom- 
ena, knowledge of which we desire — were im mediately 
accessible to us, a science would never have arisen. 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 55 

Because the mental power, the memory, of the indi- y 
vidual is limited, the material must be arran ged. If, 
for example, to every time of falling, weTfi^ the cor- 
responding space fallen through, we could be satisfied 
with that. Only, what a gigantic memory would be 
needed to contain the table of the correspondences 
of s and /. Instead of this we remember the formula . 

^= — , that is to say, the rule of derivation by means of (j ^ 

which we find, from a given /, the corresponding 5, and ^ > 



N 







this replaces the table just mentioned in a very com- 
plete, convenient, and compendious manner. 
T^ This rule of derivation, this formula, this *' law," has, 1 ^ 

^ ,:/ C!>o<J, jftOWr not inthe least more real value than the aggregate 
^ \ ^"^ Jl'^. of the individual fac ts. Its vaTüe'lof'us'lies' merely in ^ ^NT 
\<f^ the ronvenience of its use: it has an economical value. Q^ ^ 

V^^^See note 5, p. 88.) "^- --^ 

^ c^ Besides this collection of as many facts as possible ^ ^x 

in a s)ntioptical form, natural science has yet another . "» ' 

problem which is also economical in nature. It has \\ 

to resolve the more complicated facts into as few and ^ \\ 
as simple .ones_ as_possible. This we call .explaining. 
TrEeie simplest facts, to which we reduce the more ? • / • ' > ^ -* 
complicated ones, are always imintelligible in them- 
selves, that is to say, they arejiot further resolvable. 
An example of this is the fact that one mass imparts an O^ ,^ j 
su^celeration to another. 

Now, it is only, on the one hand, an economical , 
question, and, on the other, a question of taste^ at ] ^ ^"^ ( 

wh atrnxinteUigibilities we stop. People usually deceive 
themselves in thinking that they have reduced the 



r <2, 



V 



> i o 



'. ^"^ e6 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

A ^ unintelligible to the intelligible. Understanding con- 
^^/-^ (J sists in analysis alone; and people usually reduce 



^^ 



v>^ 



^ r uncommon unintelligibilities to common ones . They 

always get, finally, to propositions of the form: if A is, 

V \ ^ v^B is, thereforeJo-pro Bositions which m ust follow^te)m 

o'^v^^ 'C intuition, and, therefore, are not furthemitelligible. 

^"^ \ / . What facts one will allow to rank as ^ixuidamental 

:^ "A V ^ /acts, at which one rests, depends on custom and on 

^""^s J. ^ history. For the lowest stage of knowledge there is no 

^ j^\^ more sufficient explanation than pressure and impact. 

^ ^ The Newtonian theory of gravitation, on its appear- 

J^ ance, disturbed almost all investigators of nature 

posi^\^iL^^ because it was founded on an uncommon unintelligi- 

I bility. People tried to reduce gravitation to pressure 

and impact. At the present day gravitation no longer 

disturbs anybody: it has become a common unintelligi- 

\\.^ bility. 



\^ 






v^^ 



^' vc ^^ ' It is well known that action at a distance has caused 

v/O*^ "^ difficulties to very eminent thinkers. "A body can 

only act where it is'*; therefore there is only pressure 

and impact, and no action at a distance. But where 

is a body ? Is it only where we touch it ? Let us invert 

the matten .ajjpdy is where, it acts^_A.Jittle space is 

^ taken for touching, a greater for hearing, and a still 

< V greater for seeing. How did it come about that the 

y sense of touch alone dictates to us wher e^a body is? 

,N Moreover, contacf-action can be regarded as a special 

\ case of action at a distance. 

^ It is the result of a misconception, to believe, as 

n;. people do at the present time, that mechanical facts 

* » are more i ntelligible than ot hers, and that they can 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



57 



V 



^ 



^ 



>^ 






/o i qO 



provide the foundation for other physical facts. This 
belief arises from the fact that the history of mechanics 
Inj^ldrLi^Tid rirhnMJTfmJJTntj^f phyr.irn, in tjinf wp have -Ao f 
been on terms oiJatimacy"With-«iechanical facts for a i 
longer time. Who can say that, at some Tuture time, ^ 'Vpt 
electrical and thermal phenomena will not appear to us ^ ro-.j^zj> 



2 D 






i 



like that, when we have come to know and to be 
familiar with their simplest rules ? 

In the investigation of nature, we always and alone 

have to do with the finding of the best and simplest rules 

for the derivation of phenomena from one another. 

One fundamental fact is not at all more intelligible than 

i another: the^ hpice of funda mrntnl fnctn in fnmttrr of 

\ convenience, historY r-aod-eustom. 

The ultimate imintelligibilities on which science is 
founded must be facts, or, if they are hypotheses, must 
be capable of becoming facts. If the hypotheses are so 
chosen that their subject {Gegenstand) can never appeal 
to the senses and therefore also can never be tested, as 
is the case with the mechanical molecular theory, the 
investigator has done more than science, whose aim is 
facts, requires of him — ^and this work of supererogation 
is an evil. 

Perhaps one might think that rules^fOT jih^nomena, 
which carmotbepercevedrin the phenomena themselves, 
cannbe~Hiscovered by means of the molecular theory. 
Only that is not so. In a complete theory, to all details 
of the phenomenon details of the hypothesis must cor- 
respond, and all rules for these hypothetical things must 
also be directly transferable to the phenomenon. But 
then molecules are mereljLa valueless image. 



Q^^'yM^ 




58 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

Accordingly, we must say with J. R. Mayer: "If a 
fact is known on all its sides, it is, by that knowledge, 
explained, and the problem of science is ended."*® 

X* Mechanik der Wärme, Stuttgart, 1867, p. 239. 



IV 

THE LOGICAL ROOT OF THE THEOREM 

OF EXCLUDED PERPETUAL 

MOTION 

IF the principle of excluded perpetual motion is 
not based upon the mechanical view — a. proposi- 
tion which must be granted, since the principle was 
recognized before the development of this view — if the 
mechanical view is so fluctuating and precarious that it 
can give no sure foundation for this theorem, and, indeed, 
if it is likely that our principle is not founded on positive 
insight, because on it is foimded the most important 
positive knowledge; on what d^s th^ jrinciple res t, 
and whence comes its poweFof, convict ioßrwtkjadiich 
itiias-tdwayfr-mded^he^eatest investigators ? 

I will now try to answer this question. For this 
purpose I must go back somewhat, to the foundations 
of the logic of natural science. 

If we attentively observe natural .phenomena, we 
notice that, with t he , y^riatien of some of them, also 
variations of others occur, and in this way we have grown 
used to considering natural phenomena as dependent 
upon one another. This dependence ^f phenome na 
is called the law of causa lity. Now, people are accus- 
tomed^io give~3ifferent forms to the law of causality. 
Thus, for example, it is sometimes expressed: "Every 
effect has a cause"; which means that a variation can 
only occur with, or, as people prefer to say, in conse- 

59 



6o CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

quence of, another. But this expression is too indefinite 
to be further discussed here. Besides, it can lead to 
great inaccuracies. 

Very clearly, Fechner^<> formulated the law of causal- 
ity: "Ever3nvhere and at all times, if the same circum- 
stances occur again, the same consequence occurs again; 
if the same circumstances do not occur again, the same 
consequence does not." By this means, as Fechner 
remarked farther on, "a relation is set up between 
the things which happen in all parts of space and at aU 
times." 

I think I must add, and have already added in 
another publication, that the express drawing of space 
and time into consideration in the law of causality, is 
at least superfluous. Since we only recognize what we 
call time and space by certain phenomena, spatial and 
temporal determinations are only determinations by 
means of other phenomena. If, for example, we 
express the positions of earthly bodies as functions of 
the time, that is to say, as functions of the earth^s 
angle of rotation, we have simply determined the 
dependence of the positions of the earthly bodies on 
one another. ^ 

The earth's angle of rotation is very ready to our 
hand, and thus we easily substitute it for other phenom- 
/ ena which are connected with it but less accessible to us; 
it is a kind of money which we spend to avoid the incon- 
venient tradittg-with -phenomena,* so "fhäT"Üm proverb 
"Time is money" has also here a meaning. We can 
eIimiiiate~tiine""frDm every law of nature by putting 

^9 Berichte der sächs. Ges. zu Leipzigs Vol. II, 1850, 



to 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 6l 

in its place a phenomenon dependent on the earth's 
angle of rotation. 

The same holds of space. We know positions in 
space bjJb^ciflteLliuii uf ouF-retina, of our optical or 
other measuring apparatus. And our Xj y, z 'm the 
equations of physics are, indeed, nothing else than con- 
venient names for these a ffections. Spatial determina- 
tions are^ therefore, agaiiTget enninatio ns of phenomena 
by meajisjitotfa er phea ofllenaT 

le present tendency of physics is to represent every 
phenomenon as a function of other phenomena and of 
certain spatial and temporal positions. If, now, we 
imagine the spatial and temporal positions replaced in 
the above manner, in the equations in question, we 
obtain simply every phenomenon as function of other 
phenomena. (See note 6, p. 88.) 

Thus the law of causality is sußcienäy characterized 
by saying that it is the ftrrjMippo'iit'im of Ihmnufual 
dep endence j ii^Jihenomena. Certain idle questions, for 
example, whether the cause precedes or is simultaneous 
with the effect, then vanish by themselves. 

The law of causality is identical with the supposition 
that between the natural phenomena a, ^, 7, S, . . . , c» 
certain equations subsist. The law of causality says 
nothing about the ni^b^r offra^^oOhpsfi^itf tions; 
it TS'-tfie^proKefi^^oFpositiv^ ^avestig^tion to 

determine this; but it is clear that if the number of the 
equations were greater than or equal to the number 
of the a, )8, 7, 8, . . . , a>, all the a, ^8, 7, S, .^^. , <o 
woul d be th ereby overdeterrained or at least completely 
t^ermined. The fact of the varying of nature there- 




62 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

fore proves that the number of the equations is less 
than that of the a, Ä 7, S, . . . , «. 

But with this a certain indefiniteness in nature 
remains behind, and I will at once call attention to it 
here, because I believe that evai investigators of nature 
have sometimes overlooked it, and have thereby been 
led to very strange theorems. For instance, such a 
theorem is that defended by W. Thomson^® and Clau- 
sius,*' according to which after an infinitely long time 
the imiverse, by the fundamental theorems of thermo- 
dynamics, must die the death of heat, that is to say, 
,^ according to which all mechanical motion vanishes and 
\ finally passes over into heat. Now such a theorem 
Wimciated about the whole universe seems to me to be 
illusory throughout. 

As soon as a certain number of phenomena is given, 
(^the others are co-determined, but the law of causality 

. , ^ v^ V d^^^ ^^^ ^y *^ ^^^^ ^^^ imiverse, the totality of phenom- 
OV'^ v^ ^ ^ ena, is aiming, if we may so express it, and this cannot 
^ Y V\ A I be deUJriumed by any investigation; it is no scientific 
\v^ \vj V* |\ question. This lies in the natiure of things. 

t;' ,^ The universe is like a machine in which the motion 

." \V. /'N of certain parts is determined by that of others, only 

^ ^^ \^ nothing is determined about the motion of the whole 

machine. 

If we say of a thing in the universe that, after the 
lapse of ä certain time, it imdergoes the variation A, we 
posit it as dependent on another part of the imiverse, 

»oPhU, Mag.f October, 1852; McUh. end Phys. Papers, I, p. 511. 
ax Pogg, Ann.y Bd. 93, Dezember, 1854; Der zweite HauptsaU d 
mech. Wärmetheorie, Braunschweig, 1867. 



X r 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 63 

which we consider as a clock. But if we assert such a . j/-^ 

theorem for the universe itself, we have deceived our- ,^_^ . 

selves m that we have nothing over to which we could i \ -0 ^ (I 

refSlEe5mverseJ.s Jo ä clock.' For the universe there ^ y)^^ ^^^^^ 
Slio time. Scientific statements like the one mentioned ^ c 

seem to me worse than the worst philosophical ones. ' c c oA-^ 

People usually think that if the state of the whole ^ 

universe is given at one moment, it is completely 
determined at the next one; but an illusion has crept in 
there. This next moment is given by the advance of 
the earth. The position of the earth belongs to the 
circimistances. But we easily conmiit the error of 
counting the same circumstance twice. If the earth 
advances, this and that occur. Only the question as 
to when it will have advanced has no meaning at all. 
The answer can be given only in the form: It has 
advanced farther then, if it has advanced farther. 

It may not be imimportant for the investigator of 
nature to consider and recognize the- iiide t erm ination 



wfaictnEe law of cau sality leav e s - TJVef. To be sure, 



the only value of this for him is to keep him from 
transgressing its limits. On the other hand, an idle 
philosopher could perhaps connect his ideas on freedom 
of the will with this, with better luck than he has had 
hitherto in the case of other gaps in knowledge. (See 
note 7, p. 90.) For the investigator of nature there is 
nothing else to find out but the dependence of phe- 
nomena on one another. 

Let us call the totality of the phenomena on which 
a phenomenon a can be considered as dependent, the 
cause. If this totality is given, a is determined, and 



64 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

determined uniquely. Thus the law of causality may 
also be expressed in the form: " The eflFect is determined 
by the cause." 

This last form of the law of causality may well have 

been that which was already in existence at a very low 

stage of human culture, and yet existed in full clearness. 

A In general, a lower stage of knowledge may perhaps 

"^^ ^he distinguished from a higher one not so much by the 

^ difiference of the conception of causality as by the 

r • manner of application of this conception. 

.^ % , r^ H^ wh^ b^s no experience will, because of the com- 

vv."^ ^^Y ijjrntinn of t h e p hfnofrrm n RurrounHinc h irrij easily 

>A^ ^^ J^ J^ suppose a connexion between things _whidL-have no 

"^ ^Ao'vM' perceptible influence on one another. Thus, for 



/. 



l'-' V" ^ 



example, an alchemist or wizard may easily think that, 
if he cooks quicksilver with a Jew's beard and a Turk's 
nose at midnight at a place where roads cross, while 
nobody coughs within the radius of a mile, he will get 
gold from it. The man of science of to-day knows from 
experience that such circumstances do not alter the 
chemical nature of things, and accordingly he has a 
smoother path to traverse. Science has grown almosÖ 
-v \ more by what it has learned to ignore than by what ij 
has had to take into account. 

If we call to remembrance our early youth, we find 
that the conception of causality was there very clearly, 
but not the correct and fortunate application of it. In 
my own case, for example — ^I remember this exactly — 
there was a turning-point in my fifth year. Up to that 
time I represented to myself everything which I did not 
understand — a, pianoforte, for instance — as simply a 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 65 

motley assemblage of the most wonderful things, to 
which I ascribed the sound of the notes. That the 
pres'sed key struck the cord with the hanmier did not 
occur to me. Then one day I saw a wind-mill. I saw 
how the cogs on the axle engaged with the cogs which 
drive the mill-stones, how one tooth pushed on the 
other; and, from that time on, it became quite clear to 
me that all is not coimectedjwith allt but that, unde r^-^^ 
^circuJSIgHms^ rhgrg^ilX-rhoirft. At the present time, 
every child has abundant opportunities for making 
this step. But there was a time, as the epidemic of 
belief in witches, which belief lasted many centuries, 
proves, in which this step was only permitted to the 
greatest minds. 

By this I only wanted to show that, without positive 
ei^periences, the kw of j::ausality is empty and barren. 
This appears still better with another theorem, which 
we recognize at once as an inverse of the law of causality 
— ^with the law of sufficient reason. Let us explain 
this law by some examples. 

Let us take a straight horizontal bar, which we sup- 
port in its middle and at both ends of which we hang 
equal weights. Then we perceive at once that equilib- 
rium must subsist, because there is no reason why the 
bar should turn in one direction rather than in the 
other. So Archimedes concluded. 

If we let four equal forces act at the centre of gravity 
of a regular tetrahedron in the directions of its vertices, 
equilibrium reigns. Again there is no reason why 
motion should result in one direction rather than in 
another. 



66 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

Only this is not expressed quite properly: we ought 
"^thfT-tO ^^y ^^^^ thprf k a rf^gnn thflt^ in these cases, 
nothing happens. For the efifect is deteiaönedTby the 
causepand the one and only eflFect which is here deter- 
mined by the cause is«2^$ffe€t-at>all. In fact, if any 
eflFect were to occur, no rule of denvation of it from 
the circumstances could be given. If, for example, we 
imagine any resultant in the above tetrahedron of 
forces and set up a rule for its derivation, there are 
eleven other resultants which can be found by the same 
y^ ^ J rule. Consequently, nothing is determined. The one 
'^ J^ vand only eflFect which is determined in this case is the 
>^^ >\' r^ N. V^ff^c^ which is equal to zero. The law of sufficient 

^ reason is not essentially diflFerent from the law of causal- 
\ ity or from the theorem: "The eflFect is determined by 
the cause." 

But how is_a_persqnjKhQ^has made no experiments 

to apply this theorem ? Give hTm a lever with arms of 

equal length and with its ends loaded with equal 

. weights, but with the weights and arms of diflFerent 

xV^.o-" ,, ' colours and forms. Without experimental knowledge, 

^ ^ \' \^- he will never discover those circumstances which alone 

^ 1\ yr- . y are relevant. As an example of how-important experi- 





\ N , 4, 



vr 



. :! ' ence is in such derivations, I will give Galileo's demon- 

\S stration of the law of the lever. GaUleo borrowed it 

from Stevinus and slightly modified it, and Stevinus 
somewhat varied Archimedes's demonstration. 

A horizontal prism ^ J5 is hung at the ends by two 
threads u and ^^ on to a horizontal bar a 6, which can 
be rotated about its middle c, or is hung up there by a 
thread. Such a system is, as we see at once, in equilib- 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 



67 



num. If, now, we divide the prism into two parts of 
lengths 2m and 2» by a section at -E, after we have 
attached two new threads p and q at both sides of the 
section, equilibrium still subsists. It will also still 
subsist if we hang the piece ^4 £ in its middle by the 
thread r, and E Bhy s toaby and take away p, q, u^ v. 
But then at a distance n from c hangs a prism of weight 

Pig. «. 




2m, and at a distance m from c hangs a prism of wei^t 
2n. Now the practical physicist knows that the tension 
of the threads, which alone mediates between the 
"* prism and the bar, depends only on the magnitude, 
land not on the form, of the weight. Therefore we can, 
again without disturbance of the equilibrium, replace 
the pieces of the prism by any other weights 2m and 2w; 
and this gives the known law of the lever. 

Now, he who had not had a great deal of experience 
in mechanical things certainly could not have carried 
out such a demonstration. 

Yet another example. At A and B are the equal 
and parallel forces P and — P to act. As is well known, 
they have no resultant. Let us suppose, for example, 
that— iJ is a resultant, then we must also suppose that 



68 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

R is one, for it is determined by the same rule as —R^ 
if we turn round the figure through two right angles. 
Consequently, the one and only resultant completely 
determined by the circumstances is, in this case, no 
resultant. However, this holds only if we know already 
that we have to seek the resultant in the plane of sym- 
metry of the system, that is to say, in the plane of P and 
— P, and that the forces P and — P have no lateral 
„. . eflFect. But apart from 

this, a resultant is at once 
imambiguously determined 
-J^ rM by the following rule, for 
example. Place yourself 
so that your feet are at one 
of the points A, B, with 
your head in the direction 



\ 



of the force acting there, and look towards the other 
point, drawing the resultant towards the right, per- 
pendicularly to the plane (P, — P). In fact, the part 
of line thus determined has a signification for our case. 
It is, however, not the resultant, but the axis of the 
Poinsot's couple represented in Fig. 7. 

If P and — P were not simple forces, but the axes of 
a Poinsot's couple — if we had, consequently, things 
aflfected with a certain lateralness — the direction just 
determined would represent the direction of the resultant 
motion, if we choose the axes so that, for an observer 
with his head at the arrow-head and his feet at B, the 
rotation takes place in the plane through B perpen 
dicular to — P in the direction of the hands of a clock. 

Now, whether the things we have to consider have 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 69 

such a lateralness often cannot be determined at the 
first glance, but can only be so determined by means of 
much experience. The lateralness of light remained 
hidden for a long time, and caused great surprise to its 
discoverer Malus. If an electric current flows in the 
vertical plane drawn through a magnetic needle, from 
the south pole towards the north pole, one thinks that 
all is symmetrical with respect to this plane and that the 
needle could, at most, move in this plane. One is 
greatly surprised when one hears for the first time that 
the north pole deviates to the left of a swinuner in the 
current, who is looking at the needle. 

The law of sufficient reason is an excellent instrument 
in the hands of an experienced investigator, but is an 
empty formula in the hands of even the most talented 
people in whom special knowledge is lacking. 

After these considerations, now, it will not be hardor\'^ "^ f^ t 
for us to discover the source from which the principle ^ ^\,.^- 
of excluded perpetual motion arises. It is again only i . 'i - '* 
another form of the law of causality. Ic^aJ^ ^ '■ ^ ^ "^ -, 

"It is not possible to create work out of nothing." 
If a group of phenomena is to become the source of 
continual work, this means that it shall become a source 
of continual variation of another group of phenomena. 
For, by means of the general connexion of nature, all 
phenomena are also connected with mechanical phenom- 
ena, and therefore with the performance of work. Every 
source of continual variation of phenomena is a source 
of work, and inversely. 

If, now, the phenomena a, y8, 7, . . . depend on the 
phenomena a;, y, 2, . . . , certain equations 



( 



.'^ 



70 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

ß^hipc, y,z, . . .), 

subsist, from which a, y8, '7, . . . are uniquely deter- 
mined when Xy jy z, . . . are given. Now, it is clear 
that: 

1. As long as :v, y, z, . . . are constant, a, /8, 7, . . . 
are; 

2. liXyjyZy . . . mafce merely one step, so do a, /S, 

3. If ^, y, z, . . . vary periodically, so do a, /8, 

^^ 4. If, finally, a, /8, 7, . . . are to undergo continual 

variations, ;r, y, z, . . . must necessarily do so. 

^^^ If a group of phenomena :v, y, z, . . . is to become 

c- a source of work, a source of the continual variation of 

another group a, )9, 7, . . . , the group :x:, y, z, . . . 

itself must be engaged in continual variation. This 

is a clear form of the theorem of excluded perpetual 

motion, and one which cannot be misinterpreted. In 

this abstract form the theorem has nothing to do 

with mechanics particularly, but can be applied to 

. all phenomena. The theorem of excluded perpetual 

-^ ^ * : / motion is merely a special case of the theorem here 

enunciated. 

The remark which has been made cannot be inverted. 
In general, certain systems of continual variations of 
AT, y, z, . . . , which make no difference to a, ß, 
7, . . . can be imagined, that is to say, groups of ap- 
pearances can be given, which are engaged in continual 
variation without being sources of continual variation 



r 






A 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 71 

of Other groups of phenomena. These are groups shut 
up in themselves. How such groups can be divided, 
that is to say, which phenomena depend on one another 
and in what manner, and which do not, can be taught 
only by experience, and the law of causality says nothing 
about it. 

The theorem of excluded perpetual motion, with- 
out positive experience, is just as empty as the law 
of sufficient reason and all formal laws of that kind. 
On 'this account — ^and history teaches this — it has 
found more and more applications in physics as positive 
knowledge progressed. First it was applied in me- 
chanics alone, then in the theory of heat, and lastly 
in the theory of electricity. Abstract theorems alo^ e 
lead t onothjn g; and Poinsot** remarked very correctly: 

[iSne vous dispense d'^tudier les choses en elles- 
mfimes, et de nous bien rendre compte des id^es qui 
font Fob jet de nos speculations.'* 

Let us illustrate the theorem of excluded per- 
petual motion by some examples. 

The vibrations of a tuning-fork are periodical 
variations; they can become a lasting source of work 
only if they themselves undergo lasting variations — 
for example, by the diminution of their amplitude. We 
hear a tuning-fork only because its vibrations thus 
decrease. 

A rotating top can perform work if its angular 
velocity decreases. 

The mere lying side by side of a copper and a zinc 
plate will generate no electric current. From where, 

»» ThSorie nouveUe de la rotation des corpSy Paris, 185 1, p. 80. 



72 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

indeed, would the continual variation come if the plates 
themselves imderwent no such variation? But if a 
continual chemical change of the plates occurs, we have 
no further objection to make against the supposition 
of an electric current. 

An example of the unpermissibility of the process of 
inversion mentioned above is as follows: A top which 
is protected from resistance can rotate uniformly with- 
out becoming a source of work. Its angular velocity 
remains constant, but its angle of rotation varies *con- 
tmually* This does not contradict the principle. But 
experience adds — ^what the principle does not know — 
that in this case only variations of velocity, and not 
variations of position, can become a source of other 
variations But if one were to think that the top's 
continual variation of position is connected with no 
other continual variation, it would again be a mistake. 
It is connected with the increasing angle of rotation of 
the earth. This view leads, to be sure, to a peculiar 
conception of the law of inertia, into the further dis- 
cussion of which we shall not enter. 

Though the principle of excluded perpetual motion 
is very fruitful in the hands of an experienced in- 
vestigator, it is useless in a department of experience 
which has not been accurately explored. 

People have put a special value on the fact that the 
sum of the store of the work at our disposal and the 
vis viva, or the energy, is constant. Only, although we 
must admit that such a commercial or housekeeping 
expression is very convenient, easily seized, and suitable 
to human nature, which is planned throughout on 



CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 73 

economical grounds, we find, on looking into the matter 
quietly and accurately, that there is nothing essentially 
more in such a law than in any other law of nature. 

The law of causality supposes a dependence between 
the natural phenomena a, )8, 7, .... It is the prob- 
lem of the investigator of nature to find out the manner 
of this dependence. Now, it does not matter very much 
how the equations representing this dependence are 
written. All will agree that it makes no great differ- 
ence in which of the three forms an equation is written, 

/(a, ft 7, . . 0=0» «=^(«, ft 7, . . .)i -^(«j ft % • . .)=const., 

and that in the last of these forms there lies no specially 
higher wisdom than in the others. 

But it is merely by this form that the law of the 
conservation of work differs from other laws of nature. 
We can easily give a similar form to any other law of 
nature; thus, we can write Mariotte's law, where p is 
the force of expansion and v is the volume of the unit 
of mass, in the form log p+\og 2;= const. However 
beautiful, simple, and perspicuous much in the form of 
the theorem of the conservation of work looks, I cannot 
feel any enthusiasm for the mysticism which some people 
love to push forwards by means of this theorem. 

By this I believe that I have shown that the theo- 
rem of excluded perpetual motion is merely a special 
form of the law qf^ causality, which law results imme- 
diately from the supposition of the dependence of 
phenpmejia..on one another— -a supposition which pre- 
cedes every scientific investigation; and which is quite 
unconnected with the mechanical view of nature, but 



74 CONSERVATION OF ENERGY 

is consistent with any view, if only it firmly retains a 
strict rule by laws. 

We have, on this occasion, seen that the riches which 
investigators of nature have, in the course of time, 
heaped up by their work are of very different kinds. 
They are in part actual pieces of knowledge, in part 
also superseded theories, great and small, points of 
view that were now and then useful at an earlier stage, 
but are now irrelevant, philosophemes — ^among them 
some of the worst kind, by which some people wrongly 
condemn investigators of nature — ^and so on. It can 
only be useful sometimes to hold a review of these 
treasures; and this gives us the opportimity of putting 
aside what is worthless, and one does not run the risk 
of confusmg deeds of assignment with property. 

The object of natural science is the connexion of 
phenomena; but the theories are like dry leaves which 
fall away when they have long ceased to be the lungs of 
the tree of science. 



NOTES 

I. (See p. 28.) The law of inertia was afterwards 
formulated by Newton in the following way: 

"Corpus onine perseverare in statu suo quiescendi 
vel movendi uniformiter in directum nisi quatenus a 
viribus impressis cogitur statum ilium mutare." 

Philosophiae Naturalis Principia Mathematical Amstaelo- 
dami, 17 14, Tom. I, p. 12 (Lex. I of the "Axiomata sive leges 
motus"); cf. pp. 2, 358. [The first edition of the Principia was 
published in London in 1687, the second edition at Cambridge 
in 1 7 13, the third in London in 1726, and an English translation, 
in two volumes, by Andrew Motte, in London,- 1729 (American 
editions, New York, 1848 and 1850, one vol.). Full bibbo- 
graphical information as to the various editions and translations 
of Newton's works is given in George J. Gray's book, A Bibliog- 
raphy of the Works of Sir Isaac Newton^ 2d ed., Cambridge, 
1907.] 

Since Newton, this law, which was with Galileo a 
mere remark, has attained the dignity and intangible- 
ness of a papal dictum. Perhaps the best way to 
enunciate it is: Every body keeps its direction and 
velocity as long as they are not altered by outer forces. 

Now, I remarked many years ago that there is in this 
law a great mdefiniteness; for which body it is, with 
respect to which the direction and velocity of the body 
in motion is determuied, is not stated. I first drew 
attention to this indefiniteness, to a series of paradoxes 
which can be deduced from it, and to the solution of the 
difficulty, in my course of lectures " Ueber einige Haupt- 

75 



76 NOTES 

fragen der Physik" in the summer of 1868, before an 
audience of about forty persons. I referred regularly to 
the same subject in the years following, but my investiga- 
tion was not printed for reasons stated in the next note. 

Now, a short while ago, C. Neumann' discussed this 
point, and foimd exactly the same indefiniteness, diffi- 
culties, and paradoxes in the law. Although I was sorry 
to have lost the priority in this important matter, yet 
the exact coincidence of my views with those of so 
distinguished a mathematician gave me great pleasure 
and richly compensated me for the disdain and sur- 
prise which almost all the physicists with whom I dis- 
cussed this subject showed. Also, I think that I may, 
without fear, assert my independence in a matter of 
which I spoke before so large an audience and so long 
before. 

Now, I must add that, although the difficulties 
which I found in the law of inertia exactly coincide with 
those of Neumann, yet my solution of them is dififerent. 
Neumann. thought that he had removed the difficulties 
by considering all motion as absolute and determined by 
means of a hypothetical body a. Only then everything 
remains as it was of old. The law of inertia appar- 
ently receives a more distinct enunciation, but it did not 
turn out differently in practice. This appears from 
the following considerations. 

Obviously it does not matter whether we think of the 
earth as turning round on its axis, or at rest while the 
celestial bodies revolve roimd it. Geometrically these 

I [Ueber die Principien der Galilei-Newton^ sehen Theorie 
I^ipzig, 1870.] 



NOTES 77 

are exactly the same case of a relative rotation of the 
earth and of the celestial bodies with respect to one 
another. Only, the first representation is astronomi- 
cally more convenient and simpler. 

But if we think of the earth at rest and the other 
celestial bodies revolving round it, there is no flatten- 
ing of the earth, no Foucault's experiment, and so on — 
at least according to our usual conception of the law of 
inertia. Now, one can solve the difficulty in two ways: 
Either all motion is absolute, or our law of inertia is 
wrongly expressed. Neumann preferred the first sup- 
position, I, the second. The law of inertia must be 
so conceived that exactly the same thing results from 
the second supposition as from the first. By this it will 
be evident that, in its expression, regard must be paid 
to the masses of the universe. 

In ordinary terrestrial cases, it will answer our 
purposes quite well to reckon the direction and velocity 
with respect to the top of a tower or a comer of a room; 
in ordinary astronomical cases, one or other of the stars 
will suffice. But because we can also choose other 
comers of rooms, another pinnacle, or other stars, the 
view may easily arise that we do not need such a point at 
all from which to reckon. But this is a mistake; such 
a system of co-ordinates has a value only if it can be 
determined by means of bodies. We here fall into the 
same error as we did with the representation of time. 
Because a piece of paper money need not necessarily 
be funded by a definite piece of money, we must not 
think that it need not be funded at all. 

In fact, any one of the above points of origin of co- 



78 NOTES 

ordinates answers our purposes as long as a sufficient 
number of bodies keep fixed positions with respect to 
one another. But if we wish to apply the law of inertia 
in an earthquake, the terrestrial points of reference 
would leave us in the lurch, and, convinced of their 
uselessness, we would grope after celestial ones. But, 
with these better ones, the same thing would happen as 
soon as the stars showed movements which were very 
noticeable. When the variations of the positions of the 
fixed stars with respect to one another cannot be dis- 
regarded, the laying down of a system of co-ordinates 
has reached an end. It ceases to be immaterial whether 
we take this or that star as point of reference; and we 
>^ can no longer reduce these systems to one another. We 
ask for the first time which star we are to choose, and 
in this case easily see that the stars cannot be treated 
indifferently, but that because we can give preference 
to none, the influence of all must be taken into con- 
sideration. 

We can, in the application of the law of inertia, 
disregard any particular body, provided that we have 
enough other bodies which are fixed with respect to 
one another. If a tower falls, this does not matter to 
us; we have others. If Sirius alone, like a shooting- 
star, shot through the heavens, it would not disturb us 
very much; other stars would be there. But what 
would become of the law of inertia if the whole of the 
heavens began to move and the stars swarmed in con- 
fusion? How would we apply it then? How would 
it have to be expressed then ? We do not inquire after 
one body as long as we have others enough; nor after 



NOTES 79 

one piece of money as long as we have others enough. 
Only in the case of a shattering of the universe, or 
a bankruptcy, as the case may be, we learn that all 
bodies, each with its share, are of importance in the law 
of inertia, and all money, when paper money is funded, 
is of importance, each piece having its share. 

Yet another example: A free body, when acted 
upon by an instantaneous couple, moves so that its cen- 
tral ellipsoid with fixed centre rolls without slipping 
on a tangent-plane parallel to the plane of the couple. 
This is a motion in consequence of inertia. Here the 
body makes very strange motions with respect to the 
celestial bodies. Now, do we think that these bodies, 
without which one cannot describe the motion imagined, 
are without influence on this motion ? Does not that 
to which one must appeal explicitly or implicitly when 
one wishes to describe a phenomenon belong to the 
most essential conditions, to the causal nexus of the 
phenomenon? The distant heavenly bodies have, in 
our example, no influence on the acceleration, but they 
have on the velocity. 

Now, what share has every mass in the determi- 
nation of direction and velocity in the law of inertia ? 
No definite answer can be given to this by our experi- 
ences. We only know that the share of the nearest 
masses vanishes in comparison with that of the farthest. 
We would, then, be able completely to make out the 
facts known to us if, for example, we were to make the 
simple supposition that all bodies act in the way of 
determination proportionately to their masses and 
independently of the distance, or proportionately to the 



8o NOTES 

distance, and so on. Another expression would be: 
In so far as bodies are so distant from one another that 
they contribute no noticeable acceleration to one another, 
all distances vary proportionately to one another. 

I will return to the subject on another occasion. 

2. (See p. 29.) Perhaps I may mention here that 
I tried to get my bearings with respect to the concept 
of mass by the help of the principle of excluded per- 
petual motion. My note on this subject was returned 
as unusable by Poggendorff, the then editor of the 
Annalen der Physik und der Chemie, after he had had 
it about a year, and it appeared later in the fourth 
volume of Carl's Reperiorium.^ This rejection was also 
the reason why I did not publish my investigations on 
the law of inertia. If I ran up against the physics of 
the schools in so simple and clear a matter, what could 
I expect in a more diflScult question? The Annalen 
often contain pages of fallacies about Torricelli's 
theorem and the blush of dawn — ^written, to be sure, 
in "physical language"; but the inclusion of a short 
note which is not wholly written in that jargon would 
obviously greatly lower the value of the Annalen in the 
eyes of the public. 

The following is a complete reproduction of the note 
in question : 

ON THE DEFINITION OF MASS 

The circumstance that the fundamental propositions of 
mechanics are neither wholly a priori nor can wholly be dis- 
covered by means of experience — for sufficiently numerous and 

a Ueher die Definition der Masse, Repertorium für physikalische 
Technik . . . . , Bd. IV, 1868, pp. 355 sqq. 



NOTES 8l 

accurate experiments cannot be made — ^results in a pecubarly 
inaccurate and unscientific treatment of these fimdamental 
propositions and conceptions. Rarely is distinguished and stated 
clearly enough what is a priori, what empirical, and what is 
hypothesis. 

Now, I can only imagine a scientific exposition of the funda- 
mental propositions of mechanics to be such that one regards 
these theorems as hypotheses to which experience forces us, and 
that one afterwards shows how the denial of these h)rpotheses 
would lead to contradictions with the best-established facts. 

As evident a priori we can only, in scientific investigations, 
consider the law of causality or the law of sufficient reason, 
which is only another form of the law of causality. No investi- 
gator of nature doubts that imder the same circumstances the 
same always results, or that the effect is completely determined 
by the cause. It may remain imdecided whether the law of 
causality rests on a powerful induction or has its foundation 
in the psychical organization (because in the psychical life, too, 
equal circvunstances have equal consequences). 

The importance of the law of sufficient reason in the hands 
of an investigator was proved by Clausius's works on thermody- 
namics and Kirchhoff's researches on the connexion of absorption 
and emission. The well-trained investigator accustoms himself 
in his thought, by the aid of this theorem, to the same definiteness 
as nature has in its actions, and then experiences which are not 
in themselves very apparent suffice, by exclusion of all that is 
contradictory, to discover very important laws connected with 
the said experiences. 

Usually, now, people are not very chary of asserting that a 
proposition is immediately evident. For example, the law of 
inertia is often stated to be such a proposition, as if it did not 
need the proof of experience. The fact is that it can only have 
grown out of experience. If masses imparted to one another, 
not acceleration, but, say, velocities which depended on the dis- 
tance, there would be no law of inertia; but whether we have 
the one state of things or the other, only experience teaches. 
If we had merely sensations of heat, there would be merely 



Sa NOTES 

equalizing velocities (Ausgleichungsgeschwindigkeiten) , which 
vanish with the differences of temperature. 

One can say of the motion of masses: "The effect of every 
cause persists," just as conectiy as the opposite: "Cessante 
causa cessat effectus"; it is merely a matter of words. K we 
call the resulting velocity the "effect," the first proposition is 
true, if we call the acceleration the "effect," the second is 
true. 

Also people try to deduce a priori the theorem of the parallelo- 
gram of forces; but they must always bring in tacitiy the suppo- 
sition that the forces are independent of one another. But by 
this the whole derivation becomes superfluous. 

I will now illustrate what I have said by one example, and 
show how I think the conception of mass can be quite scientifically 
developed. The difficulty of this conception, which is pretty 
generally felt, lies, it seems to me, in two circumstances: (i) in 
the unsuitable arrangement of the first conceptions and theorems 
of mechanics; (2) in the silent passing over important presupr 
positions lying at the basis of the deduction. 

P 
Usually people define m=- and again p=mg. This is 

o 

either a very repugnant circle, or it is necessary for one to con- 
ceive force as "pressure." The latter cannot be avoided if, as 
is customary, statics precedes dynamics. The difficulty, in this 
case, of defining, magnitude and direction of a force is well 
known. 

In that principle of Newton, which is usually placed at the 
head of mechanics, and which runs: "Actioni contrariam semper 
et aequalem esse reactionem: sive corporum duorum actiones in 
se mutuo semper esse aequales et in partes contrarias dirigi," 
the "actio" is again a pressure, or the principle is quite imin- 
telligible unless we possess already the conception of force and 
mass But pressure looks very strange at the head of the quite 
phoronomical mechanics of today. However, this can be avoided. 

If there were only one kind of matter, the law of sufficient 
reason would be sufficient to enable us to perceive that two com- 
pletely similar bodies can impart to each other only equal and 



NOTES 83 

apposite accelerations. This is the one and only effect which 
is completely determined by the cause. 

Now, if we suppose the mutual independence of forces, the 
following easily results. A body i4, consisting of m bodies a, 
is in the presence of another body By consisting of m' bodies a. 
Let the acceleration of .4 be and that of 5 be 0'. Then we 
have <t>''4>^—in''.m. 

If we say that a body A has the mass m if it contains the 
body a m times, this means that the accelerations vary as the 
masses. 

To find by experiment the mass-ratio of two bodies, let us 

allow them to act on one another, and we get, when we pay 

m /^\ 
attention to the sign of the acceleration, ~7=~~(t/ • 

If the one body is taken as unit of mass, the calculation gives 
the mass of the other body. Now, nothing prevents us from 
appl3dng this definition in cases in which two bodies of different 
matter act on one another. Only, we cannot know a priori 
whether we do not obtain other values for a mass when we 
consult other bodies used for purposes of comparison and other 
forces. When it was found that A and B combine chemically 
in the ratio a'.h of their weights and that A and C do so in the 
ratio a:c of their weights, it could not be known beforehand 
that B and C combine in the ratio h\c. Only experience can 
teach us that two bodies which behave to a third as equal masses 
will also behave to one another as equal masses. 

If a piece of gold is opposed to a piece of lead, the law of 
sufficient reason leaves us completely. We are not even justified 
in expecting contrary motions: both bodies might accelerate in 
the same direction. The calculation would then lead to negative 
masses. 

But that two bodies, which behave as equal masses to a 
third, behave as such to one another with respect to any forces, 
is very likely, because the contrary would not be reconcilable 
with the law of the conservation of work {Kraft), which has 
hitherto been found to be valid. 

Imagine three bodies A, By and C movable on an absolutely 




84 NOTES 

smooth and absolutely fixed ring. The bodies are to act on 
one another with any forces. Further, both A and B, on the 

one hand, and A and C, on the 
other, are to behave to one another 
as equal masses. Then the same 
must hold between B and C. If, 
for example, C behaved to £ as a 
greater mass to a lesser one, and we 
gave B a velocity in the direction 
of the arrow, it would give this 
velocity wholly to A by impact, and 
A would give it wholly to C. Then 
C would communicate to 5 a greater 
velocity and yet keep some itself. 
With every revolution in the direction of the arrow, then, the 
vis viva in the ring would increase; and the contrary would take 
place if the original motion were in a direction opposite to that 
of the arrow. But this would be in glaring contradiction with 
the facts hitherto known. 

If we have thus defined mass, nothing prevents us from 
keeping the old definition of force as product of mass and accelera- 
tion. The law of Newton mentioned above then becomes a 
mere identity. 

Since all bodies receive from the earth an equal acceleration, 
we have in this force (their weight) a convenient measure of 
their masses, again, however, only under the two suppositions 
that bodies which behave as equal masses to the earth do so to 
one another, and with respect to every force. Consequently, the 
following arrangement of the theorems of mechanics would appear 
to me to be the most scientific. 

Theorem of experience. — Bodies placed opposite to one 
another conmiimicate to each other accelerations in opposite 
senses in the direction of their line of jimction. The law of 
inertia is included in this. 

Definition. — Bodies which communicate to each other equal 
and opposite accelerations are said to be of equal mass. We 
gpt the mass-value of a body by dividing the acceleration which 



NOTES 85 

it gives the body with which we compare others, and choose as 
the unit, by the acceleration which it gets itself 

Theorem of experience. — ^The mass-values remain unaltered 
when they are determined with reference to other forces and to 
another body of comparison which behaves to the first one as 
an equal mass. 

Theorem of experience. — The accelerations which many 
masses communicate to one another are mutually independent. 
The theorem of the parallelogram of forces is included in this. 

Definition. — Force is the product of the mass-value of a body 
into the acceleration communicated to that body. 

Prague 
November 15, 1867 

3. (See p. 47.) The note in question appeared in 
the number for February, 1871, of the Prague journal, 
Lotos, but was, however, drawn up a year earlier. 
This is a complete reproduction of it : 

The second law of thermod)mamics can, as is well known, 
be expressed for a simple case by the equation 



rp'T'Sd I j'f J' y " » 



where Q denotes the quantity of heat transformed into work, 
at the absolute temperature J", and Q' the quantity of heat 
which simultaneously sunk from the higher temperature T to 
the temperature T\ 

Now, we have not far to seek for the observation that this 
theorem is not limited to the phenomena of heat, but can be 
transferred to other natural phenomena, if, instead of the quantity 
of heat, we put the potential of whatever is active in the phenome- 
non, and, instead of the absolute temperature, the potential 
function. Then the theorem may be expressed thus: 

If a certain potential-value P of an agent at the potential- 
level V passes over into another form — for example, if the poten- 
tial of an electrical discharge is transferred into heat — then 
another potential-value, P', of the same agent sinks simultaneously 



86 NOTES 

from the higher potential-level F to the lower one F'. And the 
said values are connected with one another by the equation 



V^ \V' v) 



o. 



In the application of the theorem, the only questions are, 
what is to be conceived as potential (as equivalent of mechanical 
work), and what is the potential-function. In many cases this 
is self-evident and long established, in others it can easily be 
found. If, for example, we wish to apply the theorem to the 
impact of inert masses, obviously the vis viva of these masses is 
to be conceived as the potential, and their velocity as the potential- 
function. Masses of equal velocity can conununicate no vis viva 
to one another — they are at the same potential-level. 

I must reserve for another occasion the development of these 
theorems. 

Prague 
February i6, 1870 

4. (See p. 53.) The manner in which I was led to 
the view that we need not necessarily represent to our- 
selves molecular-processes spatially, at least not in a 
space of three dimensions, was as follows: 

In the year 1862, 1 drew up a compendium of physics 
for medical men, in which, because I strove after a 
certain philosophical satisfaction, I carried out rigor- 
ously the mechanical atomic theory. This work first 
made me conscious of the insufficiency of this theory, 
and this was clearly expressed in the preface and at the 
end of the book, where I spoke of a total reformation of 
our views on the foundations of physics. 

I was busied, at the same time, with psychophysics 
and with Herbart's works, and so I became convinced 
that the intuition of space is bound up with the organiza- 
tion of the senses, and, consequently, that we are not 



NOTES 87 

justified in ascribing spatial properties to things which 
are not perceived by the senses. In my lectures on 
psychophysics,3 I already stated clearly that we are not 
justified in thinking of. atoms spatially. Also, in my 
theory of the organ of hearing,^ I brought before my 
readers the series of tones as an analogue of space of 
one dimension. At the same time the quite arbitrary 
and, on this accoimt, faulty limitation of the number of 
dimensions in Herbart's derivation of ''intelligible" 
space struck me. By that, now, it became clear to me 
that, for the imderstanding, relations like those of space, 
and of any number of dimensions, are thinkable. 

My attempts to explain mechanically the spectra of 
the chemical elements and the divergence of the theory 
with experience strengthened my view that we must not 
represent to ourselves the chemical elements in a space 
of three dimensions. I did not ventiu"e, however, to 
speak of this candidly before orthodox physicists. My 
notices in Schlömilch's Zeitschrift of 1863 and 1864 
contained only an indication of it. 

All the views on space and time developed in this 
pamphlet were first communicated in my course of 
lectures on mechanics in the sunmier of 1864 and in my 
course on psychophysics delivered in the winter of 
1864-1865, which latter course was attended by large 
audiences, and also by many professors of the University 
of Graz. The most important and most general results 
of these considerations were published by me in the form 
of short notes in Fichte's Zeitschrift für Philosophie of 

3 OesUrr, Zeitschr. für praktische Heilkunde, 1863. 

4 Sitzher. der Wiener Akademie^ 1863. 



SS NOTES 

1865 and 1866. In this, external stimuli were entirely 
lacking, for Riemann's paper, which first appeared in 
1867,* was quite unknown to me. 

5. (See p. 55.) The view that in science we are 
chiefly concerned with the convenience and saving of 
thought, I have maintained since the beginning of my 
work as a teacher. Physics, with its formulae and 
potential-fimction, is especially suited to put this clearly 
before me. The moment of inertia, the central ellipsoid, 
and so on, are simply examples of substitutes by means 
of which we conveniently save ourselves the considera- 
tion of the single mass-points. I also found this view 
developed with especial clearness in the case of my 
friend the political economist E. Herrmann. From him 
I have taken what seems to me a very suitable expres- 
sion: "Science has a problem of economy or thrift." 

6. (See p. 61 ) From my essay on the development 
of presentations of space in Fichte's Zeitschrift for 1866,^ 
I permit myself to extract the following passage: 

Now, I think that we can go still farther in the scale of 
presentations of space and thus attain to presentations whose 
totality I will call physical space. 

It cannot be my intention here to criticize our conceptions 
of matter, whose insufl&ciency is, indeed, generally felt. I will 
merely make my thoughts clear. Let us imagine, then, a some- 
thin^behind {unter) matter in which different states can occur; 

5 [Riemann's work Ueber die Hypothesen, welche der Geometrie 
zu Grunde liegen was written and read to a small circle in 1854, first 
published posthumously in 1867, and reprinted in his Ges, Werke, 
pp. 255-268.] 

6 "Ueber die Entwicklung der Raumvorstellungen,'' Z«»^/»'. 
für Philosophie und philosophische Kritik, 1866. 



NOTES 89 

say, for simplicity, a pressure in it, which can become greater 
or smaller. 

Physics has long been busied in expressing the mutual 
action, the mutual attraction (opposite accelerations, opposite 
pressures) of two material particles as a function of their dis- 
tance from each other — therefore of a spatial relation. Forces 
are fimctions of the distance. But now, the spatial relations of 
material particles can, indeed, only be recognized by the forces 
which they exert on one another. 

Physics, then, does not strive, in the first place, after the 
discovery of the fundamental relations of the various pieces of 
matter, but after the derivation of relations from other, already 
given, ones. Now, it seems to me that the fundamental law of 
force in nature need not contain the spatial relations of the 
pieces of matter, but must only state a dependence between the 
states of the pieces of matter. 

If the positions in space of the material parts of the whole 
universe and their forces as functions of these positions were 
once known, mechanics could give their motions completely,' 
that is to say, it could make all the positions discoverable at any 
time, or put down all positions as functions of time. 

But, what does time mean when we consider the imiverse? 
This or that ''is a function of time'' means that it depends 
on the position of the vibrating pendulum, on the position ^f 
the rotating earth, and so on. Thus, "All positions are functions f 
of time" means, for the universe, that all positions depend / 
upon one another. 

But since the positions in space of the material parts can 
be recognized only by their states, we can also say that all the 
states of the material parts depend upon one another. 

The physical space which I have in mind — and which, at the 
same time, contains time in itself — is thus nothing other than 
dependence of phenomena on one another. A complete physics, 
which would know this fundamental dependence, would have 

7 [For this purpose, it would be necessary also to know the 
velocities of the various parts at that instant. — ^Tr.] 



90 NOTES 

no more need of special considerations of space and time, for 
these latter considerations would already be included in the 
former knowledge. 

My researches on the time-sense of the ear^ contain 
the following passage: 

Ph3rsics sets out to represent every phenomenon as a fimction 
of time. The motion of a pendulum serves as the measure 
of time. Thus, physics really expresses every phenomenon 
as a function of the length of the pendulum. We may remark 
that this also happens when forces, say, are represented as fimc- 
tions of the distance; for the conception of force (acceleration) 
already contains that of time. If one were to succeed in ex- 
pressing every phenomenon — ph3rsical and psychical — as a 
function of the phenomenon of pendulum -motion, this would 
only prove that all phenomena are so connected that any one of 
them can be represented as a function of any other. Physically, 
then, time b the representabiUty of any phenomenon as a func- 
tion of any other one. 

This view of time, now, also plays a part in my dis- 
cussion of the law of inertia. To this view, too, Neu- 
mann, in his discussion of the law of inertia, seems to 
incline. 

7. (See p. 63.) Fechner believed that he could rec- 
oncile the law of causality with the freedom of the will, 
in the following manner: 

It is at once evident that our law, in spite of the fact that 
it would be binding for all space and all time, for all matter 
aiid au spirit, yet, in its essence, leaves behind an i^ ^etf^rminft- ^ 
.tion— indeed, the greatest that can be imagined. For it says, 
to be sure, that, if the same circumstances occur again, the 
same consequence must occur again, and if not, not; but there 
IS nothing in its expression to determine in any way the manner 

8 "Ueber den Zeitsinn des Ohres," Sitzb. der Wien. Akad,, 1865 



NOTES 91 

of the first consequence at any place and with any circumstances, 
nor the manner of the occurrence of the first circumstances them- 
selves. 

Farther on, Fechner remarked that the same circum- 
stances never occur again, libr, therefore, ever exactly the 
same consequences. 

As regards the first point, the indefiniteness is put 
back to the moment of creation, but the second seems 
to me to be merely an indeterministic subterfuge. 

The indefiniteness to which I have drawn attention 
IS essentially different; it is always present and results 
immediately from the law of causality by the elimina- 
tion of space and time. 

GENERAL REMARKS 

We learn very soon to distinguish our presentations 
from our sensations (perceptions). Now, the problem 
of science can be split into three parts: 

1. The determination of the connexion of presenta- 
tions. This is psychology. 

2. The discovery of the laws of the connexion of 
sensations (perceptions). This is physics. 

3. The clear establishment of the laws of the 
connexion of sensations and presentations. This is 
psychophysics. 

If we think of the laws of connexion as mathematical, 
the establishment of those laws presupposes the measur- 
ability of all that they embrace. In that there still 
remains, to be sure, much to be desired. Fechner, in 
his Psychophysik, succeeded in measuring even the 
single sensations, but it is possible to be in doubt 



93 NOTES 

as to the meaning of this measure. A sensation of 
greater intensity is always also of another quality, and 
then Fechner's measure is more physical than psychical. 
However, these dijEculties turn out to be not insur- 
moimtable. 



AUTHOR'S NOTES TO THE SECOND 

EDITION (1909) 

To p. ig, — ^The confusion caused by the use of the 
expression "force" in a different signification is also 
shown in a communication of Faraday's of 1857 (Phil. 
Mag.y Ser. 4, Vol. XIII, p. 225 [in a paper "On the 
Conservation of Force"; also Proc. Roy. Inst., February 
27, 1857]). The same fault was committed by many 
of the most eminent investigators of that time. [Cf. 
also Wärmelehre, p. 206; and, on the history of the use 
of such terms as "work" and "energy," cf. A. Voss, 
Encykl. der math. Wiss., IV, i, 1901, pp. 102-104; ^nd 
Mach, Mechanics, p. 499, note.] 

To pp. 28 and 75. — The question of the law of inertia 
was treated at length in my Mechanics [pp. 140-141, 
142-143, 523-525, 542-547» 560-574], where all the 
literature of the subject is noticed. The last important 
work that is known to me is J. Petzoldt's article, " Die 
Gebiete der absoluten und relativen Bewegimg" (Ost- 
wald's Annalen der Naturphilosophie, VII, p. 29). 

To pp. 2Q and 80 — Further developments in my 
Mechanics [pp. i94-i97> 198-222, 243, 536-537, 539- 
540, 555-560]. 

To pp. 35-37, 47, 85-86. — ^The publications which 
contain analogous considerations — ^partly coincident, 
partly allied — are my Mechanics; Josef Popper, Die 
physikalischen Grundsatze der elektrischen Kraftüber- 

93 



94 NOTES 

Iragung, Wien, Pest, Leipzig, 1884; Helm, Die Lehre 
van der Energie, Leipzig, 1887; Wronsky, Das Inien- 
süätsgesetZj Frankfurt a. O., 1888; Mach, "Geschichte 
und Kritik des Camot 'sehen Wäxmegesetzes" (Sitzb. 
der Wien. Akad.j 1892); and Wärmelehre. As regards 
pp. 85-86 in particular, such considerations were made 
mention of, first after Camot, by Zeuner, Grundzüge 
der mechanischen Wärmetheorie, Leipzig, 2. Aufl., 1866. 
In the text of p. 86 the double resolution MV^/2, 
MV*V/2 is held to be possible, and, on this account, I 
have retained the general expression velocity instead of 
the square of the velocity as, still later, Ostwald did 
{Berichte der kgl. sächs. Gesellschaft zu Leipzig, Bd. 
XLIV, 1892, pp. 217-218). But I soon recognized that 
the potential-level is a scalar V^/2 and cannot be a vector 
V or V/2. I did not speak of this further, since Popper 
had given a sufl5cient exposition of the correspondence 
between masses and quantities. This was also done 
by Friedrich Wolfgang Adler, " Bemerkungen über die 
Metaphysik in der Ostwald'schen Energetik" (Viertel- 
jahrsschr. für wiss. Philosophie und Soziologie, Jahrg. 

29» 1905. PP- 287-333). 

To pp. 51-53* — Spaces of many dimensions seem 
to me not so essential for physics. I would only uphold 
Üiem if things of thought like atoms are maintained to 
be indispensable, and if, then, also the freedom of work- 
ing hypotheses is upheld. 

To pp. 55 and 88. — ^The principle of the economy 
of thought is developed in detail in my later writings. 

To p. 57. — I have repeatedly expressed the thought 
that the foundation of physics may be thermal or elec- 



NOTES 95 

trie, in my Mechanics and Analysis of the Sensations. 
This thought seems to be becoming an actuality. 

To pp. 60-64 and 88-90, — Space and time are not 
here conceived as independent entities, but as forms of 
the dependence of the phenomena on one another. I 
subscribe, then, to the principle of relativity, which is 
also firmly upheld in my Mechanics and Wärmelehre. 
Cf. "Zeit und Raum physikalisch betrachtet," in 
Erkenntnis und Irrtum^ Leipzig, 1905 [(2d ed., 1906), 
pp. 434-448]; H. Minkowski, Raum und Zeit, Leip- 
zig, 1909. 

To p. 91. — ^The general remarks indicate the sen- 
sationalistic standpoint which I attained by studies 
in the physiology of the senses. Further developments 
in my Bewegungsempfindungen of 1875, Analysis of the 
Sensations, and Erkenntnis und Irrtum. I have also 
clearly shown there that the nervous, subjectivistic 
apprehensions which many physicists have for the 
physics of the inhabitants of Mars are quite groundless. 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 

To p. is> — On the influence which Kant's Pro- 
legomena exerted on Mach when a boy of fifteen, 
see note on p. 23 of Analysis of the Sensations, 
1897. 

To p. 17. — The investigators referred to on this 
page are not KirchhoflF and Hehnholtz, whose works 
appeared at a later date (cf. Mechanics j p. x). Yet 
Kirchhoff is still regarded by many as the pioneer of 
descriptive physics. Cf . Mach's lecture " On the Prin- 
ciple of Comparison in Physics'' in Poptdar Scientific 
Lectures (1898), pp. 236-258. 

To p. 21. — On Stevinus's work, see, further. Me- 
chanics, pp. 24-35, 49-51» 88-90, 500-501, 515-517; 
on Galileo's discussions of the laws of falling bodies, 
ibid.y pp. 128-155, 162-163, 247-250, 520-527, 563- 
567, and Ostwald's Klassiker der exakten Wissen- 
schaften, Nr. 24, pp. 18-20, 57-59; on Huygens's 
researches on the centre of oscillation, Mechanics, pp. 
173-186; on d'Alembert's principle, ibid., pp. 331-343; 
on the principle of vis viva, ibid., pp. 343-350; on 
Torricelli's theorem, ibid., pp. 402-403; and, on the 
principle of virtual velocities, ibid., pp. 49-77; A. 
Voss in his article, "Die Prinzipien der rationellen 
Mechanik," Encykl. der math. Wiss., IV, i (1901), pp. 
66-76; and, for a historical and critical review of the 
various proofs of the principle, R. Lindt, " Das Prinzip 

96 



TRANSLATORS NOTES 97 

der virtuellen Geschwindigkeiten," Abhdl. zur Gesch. 
der Math.y Bd. XVIII, 1904, pp. 147-196.^ 

To p. 34, — See the reprint of Gauss's paper in 
Ostwald's Klassiker, Nr. 167; especially p. 28. 

Gauss's principle is discussed in Mach's Mechanics, 
pp. 350-364; Voss's above article in the Encykl. der 
math. Wiss., pp. 84-87 ; and in the notes (by myself) to 
Nr. 167 of Ostwald's Klassiker, pp. 46-48, 59-68. 

To p. J5. — From the Wärmelehre: On Camot's 
principle and its developments, pp. 211-237; on the 
principle of Mayer and Joule, pp. 238-268; and on the 
imiting of the principles, by W. Thomson and Clausius, 
in particular, pp. 269-301. 

An account of the development, meaning, and so on, 
of the principle of energy, which is, in essentials, the 
same as that in the Popular Scientific Lectures (3d ed., 
Chicago, 1898, pp. 137-185), is given in Wärmelehre, 
pp. 315-346. Cf. also the end of the note to pp. 51, 94, 
below. 

To pp. SI, p4. — On many dimensional spaces as 
mathematical helps, cf. Mechanics, pp. 493-494. 

In H. Weber's edition of Ricmann's Partielle Diffe- 
rential-Gleichungen,^^ use was made of the idea of a 
particle in a space of n dimensions to represent what 
Hertz called "the position of a system" in ordinary 

9 Also separately as an Inaugural Dissertation. Cf. E. Lampe, 
Jakrb über die Fortschr. der Maih., 1904, pp. 691-692. 

^^ Die partiellen Differential-Gleichungen der mathemoHschen 
Physik. Nach Riemann's Vorlesungen in vierter Auflage neu 
bearbeitet von Heinrich Weber, Two vols., Braunschweig, 1900- 
1901. The passage referred to occurs in the second part of the first 
volume. 



98 TRANSLATORS NOTES 

space; the "position of a system '* being the totality of 
the positions of the points of the system. 

To p. 56. — On impact and other theories of gravita- 
tion, see J. B. Stallo, The Concepts and Theories of 
Modern Physics^ 4th ed., London, 1900, pp. 52-65, 
v-vi, vii, xxi-xxiv (the three last references are to 
the "Preface to the Second Edition, *' which is not 
contained in the German translation by Hans Klein- 
peter, published at Leipzig in 1901 imder the title: 
Die Begriffe und Theorieen der modernen Physik, 
although this translation was made from the third 
English edition. This is the more regrettable as the 
preface referred to contains some indications of great 
value of Stallo's view — ^which closely resembled that 
of Mach — of the various forms of the law of causality; 
cf. below). 

To pp. 60y ÖQy 7J. — Clerk Maxwell's {Matter and 
Motion, London, edition of 1908, pp. 20-21) "General 
Maxim of Physical Science" is similar to Fechner's 
law of causality. It rims: "The diflFerence between 
one event and another does not depend on the mere 
diflFerence of the times or the places at which they 
occur, but only on diflferences in the nature, configura- 
tion, or motion of the bodies concerned." 

The question as to the meaning of "causality" in 
dynamics is discussed in Bertrand RusselPs work on 
The Principles of Mathematics, Vol. I, Cambridge, 1903, 
pp. 474-481." On p. 478 is the sentence: " Causality, 
generally, is the principle in virtue of which, from a 
sufficient number of events at a sufficient number of 

" Newton's laws of motion are discussed on pp. 482-488. 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 99 

moments, one or more events at one or more new 
moments can be inferred." 

The various forms of the law of causality were 
briefly described by J. B. Stallo, op. ciL, pp. xxxvi- 
xli" — B, discussion not, imfortunately, translated in the 
German edition. 

The present writer (" On Some Points in the Founda- 
tion of Mathematical Physics," Monist, Vol. XVIII, 
pp. 217-226, April, 1908) has attempted to formulate 
Mach's principle of causality and some other principles 
of physics in the exact mathematical manner to which 
we have become accustomed by the modem theory of 
aggregates, and to suggest some new problems in this 
order of inquiries. ^^ It is my belief that this investiga- 
tion is the only way in which we can become sure that 
the image of reality at which we aim, by successive 
approximations, is logically permissible; and also that 
only m this way can we succeed in formulating exactly 
the epistemological questions at the basis of physical 
science, and in answering them.'-* I will here give two 
illustrations of this. 

The postulate as to the "intelligibility of nature," or 
the existence of a "process of reason in nature" may, 
it seems to me,'^ be further explained as follows. In our 

I a Cf. Stallo, op. ciL, pp. 25-26. 

13 Some of the conceptions and results applied here are contained 
in my article "On the General Theory of Functions," Journ. jut 
Math.y Bd. CXXVIII, 1905, pp. 169-210. 

14 Cf. my article on "The Relevance of Mathematics," Nature^ 
May 27, 1909, Vol. LXXX, pp. 282-384. 

!S However, Mr. Russell, who is probably right, tells me that, in 
his opinion, philosophers mean by this postulate "something much 
more general and vague." 



lOO TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 

scientific descriptions, we express elements (in Mach's 
sense; see the next note, to p. 6i) as functions of other 
elements, determine by observation the character of 
these functions — ^whether they are, or may conveniently 
be considered, continuous, analytic, or so forth — ^and 
then deduce purely logically the image of the course of 
events, that is provided by this mathematical thought- 
model of nature. Thus, if a fimction of time, /(/), is 
analytic, and we know its values for any small period 
/o . . . /x> we can deduce, in a purely logical fashion, 
by means of Taylor's theorem, its value for any other 
value of / whatever. We could not do this if that aspect 
of nature with which we deal here were not susceptible 
of this mimicry by logic, so to speak; and this is what 
we mean when we speak of the existence of science 
implying a conformity of nature to our reason. 

In the second place, I will attempt an explanation of 
the attribute "uniformity" of nature. The difficulty 
lies in discovering the value of the maxim that like 
events result from the recurrence of like conditions, if 
like conditions never do recur. The solution seems to 
me to be as follows: Like conditions probably never 
do recur in the world around us, but we have learned 
by experience that we can imitate very closely the course 
of nature (in certain particulars) by means of a purely 
mathematical construction or model. In this model 
we can, of course, reproduce exactly similar circum- 
stances as often as we wish. The above law applies 
literally to our model; and that the so-conditioned 
events in the model approximately coincide with the 
observed events of nature is, I take it, what we mean 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTES lOI 

when we say that nature is uniform. The point at 
issue here is quite similar to that discussed, ä propos 
of Newton's rotating bucket, by Mach and Ward on the 
one side and Russell on the other (see my article, quoted 
above, in the Monist^ p. 221). 

Further references as to the meaning of causality in 
the light of modem theory of knowledge, and to the 
views of Mach, Stallo, and others, are as follows: 

On the history of Mach's views on mass and on the 
substitution of the concept of fimction for that of causa- 
tion, see Mechanics y pp. 555-556. The result of Mach's 
views which is of the greatest philosophical importance 
seems to be his disclosure of the character of the 
mechanical theory of nature (cf. the above translation, 
and Mechanics, pp. 495-501). This theory has been 
discussed at length and refuted — in many points after 
Mach's ideas — ^by James Ward, in the first volume of 
his Naturalism and Agnosticism (2d ed., London, 1903, 
2 vols.). 

Stallo {op. cit.y pp. 68-83) gave a sketch of the evolu- 
tion of the doctrine of the conservation of energy and 
expressed views related to those of Mach. Thus, he 
said {ibid., pp. 68-69): "In a general sense, this doc- 
trine is coeval with the dawn of human intelligence. 
It is nothing more than an application of the simple, 
principle that nothing can come from or to nothing '*; 
and, in the preface to the second edition, he said {ibid., 
pp. xl-xli) : " But physicists, and especially mathema- 
ticians, are puzzled by the circumstance that not only 
has the law of causality always been applied before 
any experiential induction was thought of " 



I02 TRANSLATORS NOTES 

A few remarks by Poincar^ on the principle of the 
conservation of energy on pp. 153-154 and 158-159 of 
his book Za science et Vhypothise (Paris, 6th ed.) are of 
an epistemological nature. 

Cf. also Hans Kleinpeter, "Ueber Ernst Mach's und 
Heinrich Hertz' principelle Auffassung der Physik," 
Archiv für systematische Philos., V, 1899, Heft 2; and 
" J. B. Stallo als Erkenntnisskritiker," Vierteljahrsschr. 
für wiss. Philos., XXV, 1901, Heft 3. 

A short exposition of the view'^ of the "symbolical 
physicists" — that our thoughts stand to things in the 
same relation as models to the objects they represent — 
is given by Ludwig Boltzmann in his article "Models" 
in the new volumes of the Encyclopaedia Britannica 
(Vol. XXX, 1902, pp. 788-791). 

To p, 61, — Mach, in the memoir translated above, 
used Erscheinungen (phenomena) for what he afterwards 
{Contributions to the Analysis of the Sensations, Chicago, 
1897, pp. 5, II, 18) called by the less metaphysical name 
of "elements," thereby avoiding a verbal trap into 
which so many philosophers have fallen (see my 
article, referred to above, in the Monist, pp. 218-219, 
n. 6). 

To p, 64, — ^The principle of the unique determina- 
tion of natural events by others has been developed by 
Joseph Petzoldt, starting from Mach's considerations 
of 1872. Petzoldt's first work was entitled Maxima, 
Minima und Ökonomie, was printed in the Vierteljahrs- 
schr. für wiss. Philos., XIV., 1890, pp. 206-239, 354- 
366, 417-442, and was also printed separately as a 

'6 This view I call the typonoetic theory 



TRANSLATORS NOTES 103 

dissertation (Altenburg, 1891). On p. 12 of the 
reprint, Petzoldt states that the principles of Euler, 
Hamilton, and Gauss'^ are merely analytical expressions 
for the fact of experience that natural events are uniquely 
determined : the essential point is not the minimum but 
this imiqueness (Einzigartigkeit). Petzoldt's view that 
the thorough determinateness of all occurrences is a 
presupposition of all science was set forth in his paper: 
"Das Gesetz der Eindeutigkeit," Vierteljahrsschr. für 
wiss. Philos., Vol. XIX, 1895, pp. 146-203. 

Cf. also Mach's references to Petzoldt in Mechanics, 

PP- 552, 558, 562-563, 571-572, 575-577, 580-581; 
cf. pp. 10, 502-504, and Wärmelehre^ pp. 324-327, for 
Mach's use of the principle of imiqueness, and a note 
farther on for further details about the principle of 
economy. 

Petzoldt's views of the thoroughgoing uniqueness 
{eindeutige Bestimmtheit) of events were explained in 
his Einführung in die Philosophie der reinen Erjahrung^^ 

»7 For German translations of some of the chief memoirs on 
these principles, very full of historical notes and modern references 
(by the present writer), see Ostwald's Klassiker^ Nr. 167 « 

»8 Erster Band: Die Bestimmtheit der SeelCf Leipzig, 1900. A 
critical notice of this volume was given by W» R. Boyce Gibson in 
Mindy N.S., IX, No. 35 Quly, 1900), pp. 389-401. The sentences 
following, in the text, are quoted from this review, pp. 391-392. 

Petzoldt maintained: (i) that the facts upon which the time- 
worn principle of causation is founded do not justify us in admitting 
more or less than the unideterminateness of all that happens; (2) that 
the psychical states being non-unideterminable by each other, the 
attempt to make them explain one another is scientifically unthink- 
able; (3) that the only way out of the difficulty is to accept the doctrine 
of psycho-physical parallelism in the sense of Avenarius. In the 
sequences of the mental life, there is neither continuity, singleness of 
direction, nor uniqueness. 



104 TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 

— in the first part an interpretation of the philosophy of 
Avenarius : 

Whenever there are a number of possible ways in which, say, 
the movement of a body would be directed, Petzoldt showed, by 
a nimiber of examples, that that path is selected, as a matter of 
fact, which possesses the following three elements of imideter- 
minateness: (i) singleness of direction, (2) uniqueness, (3) 
continuity; for in satisfying these three conditions all indeter- 
minateness is taken from its changes. The meaning of the first 
determining element is simply this, that as a matter of fact 
there is no actual ambiguity as to the sense in which any change 
takes place. Warm bodies left to themselves always grow cooler; 
heavy bodies left to themselves always fall downwards, not 
upwards. A first conceivable ambiguity is thus put to rest by 
Nature herself. In the second place Nature takes care that 
bodies shall move in such a way relatively to their Bestim- 
mungsmiUel or media of determination that the actual direction 
of motion differentiates itself from all the others by its unique- 
ness. It is only this uniqueness that gives to the actual change 
its right to be actualized, its right to be chosen in preference to 
any other possible change. Thus a ball moving freely on a 
horizontal plane passes from ^4 in a rectilinear direction to B 
and on to C It might conceivably have passed from B to D, 
where B Dis not collinear with A B; but though this course is a 
thinkable one it is not realized, because its realization would 
involve an ambiguity, for no reason could then be given why the 
direction oi B D was chosen in preference to the symmetrical 
direction B E, The direction 5 C is in this case the only one 
that is unique and therefore unambiguous. The third element, 
that of continuity, secures the possibility, of exact quantitative 
determination. 

For every occurrence [says Petzoldt'^] means of determination 
can be discovered whereby the occurrence is unambiguously 
determined, in this sense, that for every deviation from it, sup- 
posed to be brought about through the same means, at least one 

*9 Op, du, p. 39. 



TRANSLATOR'S NOT^ 10$ 

other could be found which being determined in the same way 
would be its precise equivalent, and have as it were precisely 
the same right to be actualized. 

By "means of determination" are meant just those 
means — e.g., masses, velocities, temperatures, dis- 
tances — ^by the help of which we are able to grasp an 
occurrence as singled out by its uniqueness from a 
number of equally thinkable occurrences The unide- 
terminateness of things is both a fact of Nature and the 
a priori logical condition of there being a cosmos at all 
instead of a chaos. Our thought demands it from 
Nature, and Nature invariably justifies the demand. 
In this one supreme fact of the unideterminateness of 
all things the mind finds its rest. It is an ultimate 
fact, and one can no longer ask Why ? when one comes 
to ultimate facts. 

To p. 65. — On Archimedes's deduction of the law of 
the lever, and on the uniqueness of determination of 
equilibrium, see Mechanics, pp. S-ii, 13-14, 18-19. 

To p. 66. — On the very similar methods employed 
by Galileo, Huygens, and Lagrange to demonstrate the 
law of equilibrium of the lever, see Mechanics, pp. 
11-18. 

To p. 76. — On Neumann's essay of 1870, cf. Mach's 
Mechanics, pp. 567-568, 572; Stallo, op ciL, pp. 196- 
200; Russell, op.ciU, pp. 490-491; the following note 
to p. 80; and C. Neumann, "Ueber die sogenannte 
absolute Bewegimg" {Festschrift, Ludwig Boltzmann 
gewidmet . . . . , Leipzig, 1904, pp. 252-259). 

To p. 80. — On relativity of position and motion, see 
Stallo, op. cit.y pp. 133-138, 183-206; Mach, Mechanics 



Io6 TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 

pp. 222-238, 542-547, 567-573, and Mechanik (5. Aufl., 
1904), pp. 257-263; James Ward, op. ciL, Vol. I, pp. 
70-80; Russell, op, ciLy pp. 489-493; and my article in 
the Monistf quoted above, p. 221. 

Planck has determined the form of the fundamental 
equations of mechanics which must take the place of the 
ordinary Newtonian equations of motion of a free mass- 
point if the principle of relativity is to be generally 
valid, in his paper: "Das Prinzip der Relativität und 
die Grundgleichungen der Mechanik" {Verh. der 
Deutschen Phys. Ges., Vol. VIII, 1906, pp. 136-141). 

To p. 80. — ^As regards Mach's definition of mass, it is 
interesting to find that Barr^ de Samt-Venant, in the 
paper*® in which he annoimced and applied his inde- 
pendent discovery of Hermann Grassmann's*^ "outer 
multiplication," expressly drew attention to the use of 
"geometrical quantities" in treating mechanics by only 
letting space and time combinations enter, and not 
speaking of " forces. " In the definition he gives of mass 
as a constant for each body, so chosen as to satisfy his 
"second law of mechanics''; 

he is exactly of the same view as Mach. 

Cf. also H. Pad^ ("Barre de Saint- Venant et les 

30 ** Memoire sur les sommes et les differences g^ometriques, et 
sur leur usage pour simplifier la mecanique," Compt. Rend.j T. XXI, 
1845, pp. 620-625. Cf. Hermann Hankel, Vorlesungen über die 
compleocen Zahlen und ihre Functionen (I. Theil, "Theorie der com- 
plexen Zahlensysteme "), Leipzig, 1867, p. 140. 

21 Ausdehnungslehre von 1844, For some account of the use of 
the methods of Hamilton and Grassmann in questions of mechanics, 
see Mechanics, pp. 527-528, 577-579- 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 107 

principes de la m^canique," Rev, ginirale des sciences y 
XV, 1904, pp. 761-767), who points out that, in various 
points, de Saint- Venant's views coincide with those of 
Boltzmann. 

Mach's definition has been accepted by most modem 
writers of books on dynamics; for example, Gian 
Antonio Maggi, Principii delta ieoria matematica 
del movimento dei corpiy Milano, 1896, p. 150; A. E. H. 
Love, Theoretical Mechanics^ Cambridge, 1897, p. 
87; Ludwig Boltzmann, Vorlesungen über die Principien 
der Mechanik^ I. Theil, Leipzig, 1897, p. 22, and 
Poincar^ — who, however, makes no mention of Mach's 
name — La science et Phypothise, 6th thousand, Paris, 
p. 123. 

On criticisms of Mach's definition of mass, see 
Mechanics, pp. 539-540, 558-560. 

To pp. 85-86, 93-94. — ^This analogy between heat 
and work done by gravity is known as "Zeuner's 
analogy," after Zeuner's remark in the second edition 
(1866) of his Grundzüge der mechanischen Wärmetheorie. 
See Georg Helm, Die Energetik nach ihrer geschicht- 
lichen EntTvickelung, Leipzig, 1898, pp. 254-266. 

On the subject of a "comparative physics" — ^that is 
to say, a concise expression of extensive groups of 
physical facts, which is based on the analogies observed 
between the conceptions in different branches of physics 
— see Mach, Mechanics, pp. 496-498, 583; Wärmelehre, 
pp. 117-119; and Pop. Sei. Led. (1898), p. 250;" L. 

aa Cf. also Mach, "Die Ähnlichkeit und die Analogie als Leit- 
motiv der Forschung" {Annalen der Naturphilosophie, Bd I, and 
Erkenntnis und Irrtum^ 1906, pp. 220-231). 



Io8 TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 

Boltzmann, in notes to his translation of Maxwell's 
paper of 1855 and 1856 " On Faraday's Lines of Force" 
(Ostwald's Klassiker y Nr. 69, pp. 100-102); M. Pftro- 
vitch, La micanique des phifwmbnes fondie sur les 
analogies, Paris, 1906; and Helm, op. ciL, pp. 253-266, 
322-366. 

It seems to me that the methods of a comparative 
physics, especially when aided by a calculus so well 
adapted to dealing with physical conceptions as that of 
Grassmann, Hamilton, and others, would afford a 
powerful means of discovering the ultimate principles 
of physics. Cf. the paper by de Saint- Venant referred 
to in the preceding note; M. O'Brien's paper "On 
Symbolic Forms Derived from the Conception of the 
Translation of a Directed Magnitude," in Phil. Trans., 
Vol. CXLII, 1851, pp. 161-206; papers by Grassmann 
on mechanics *3 in his Ges. Werke, Bd. II, 2. Teil; and 
Maxwell, "On the Mathematical Classification of 
Physical Quantities," Scientific Papers, Vol. II, pp. 
257-266. Cf. also Maxwell, A Treatise on Electricity 
and Magnetism, Oxford, 1873, Vol. I, pp. 8-29 (on the 
application of Lagrange's dynamical equations to 
electrical phenomena, see Vol. II, pp. 184-194) ; W. K. 
Clifford, Elements of Dynamic, Part I, "Kinematic," 
London, 1878; Hankel, op. cit., pp. 114, 118, 126, 129, 
132, 133, 134, i35> 137, 140; and Grassmann's Aus- 
dehnungslehre von 1844, passim. 

In this connexion, we may also give the following 
references: On the principle of energy, cf. Voss, op. 

«3 Especially important is Grassmann's paper: "Die Mechanik 
und die Principien der Ausdehnungslehre," in Math, Ann,, XII 1877. 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTES 109 

ciL, pp. 104-107; on the Virial and the second law of 
thermod)aianiics, ibid.f pp. 107-109, and Wärmelehre, 
p. 364; on the localization of energy, Voss, op. ciL, pp. 
109-115; on the treatment of mechanics by energetics, 
ibid., 115-116, Mach, Mechanics, p. 585, and Mechanik 
(5. Aufl., 1904), pp. 405-406, Max Planck, Das Prinzip 
der Erhaltung der Energie, 2 Aufl., Leipzig and Berlin^ 
pp. 166-213, Helm, op. cit., pp. 205-252. 

To p. 88. — ^A very slight indication of the principle 
of the economy of thought was, as Boltzmann** has 
remarked, contained in Maxwell's (1855) observation 
that, in order further to develop the theory of electricity, 
we must first of all simplify the results of earlier investi- 
gations and bring them into a form readily accessible to 
our understanding. 

On the principle of the economy of thought in 
various branches of science, see Mach, Mechanics, 
pp. x-xi, 6, 48i-494> 549> 579*583; Wärmelehre, pp. 
391-395; Pop. Sei. Led. (1898), pp. 186-213; A. N. 
Whitehead, A Treatise on Universal Algebra, Vol. I, 
Cambridge, 1898, p. 4; and my above-mentioned 
article in Nature, p. 383. 

On Mach's formal principles of economy, simplicity, 
continuity, and analogy, see Voss, op. cit., p. 20. 

«* Ostwald's Klassiker, Nr. 69, p. 100. The whole of the intro- 
duction to this paper of Maxwell's is of the greatest epistemological 
interest, as it states much more clearly than in any other of his writings 
what has been called the "symbolic" point of view in physics (see 
ibid., pp. 3-9, 99-102.) 



INDEX 



Absorption and emission, 

Kirchhoff on, 81. 
Action at a distance, 56. 
Adler, Friedrich Wolfgang, 

94. 

Alchemy and science, 64. 
Alembert, d', 22, 30, 96. 
Analogy between heat and 

work, 107. 
Analysis of the Sensations, 

9n., 12n., 95, 96, 102. 
Angle of rotation, 60. 
A priori considerations, 23. 
Arbeit, The term, 5n., 93. 
Archimedes, 65, 66, 105. 
Arreat, Lucien, 6. 
Atomic theory, Insufficiency 

of, 86. 
Atoms not to be thought 

spatially, 87. 
Avenarius, 6n., 7n., 104. 

Baumann, J., 7n. 
Bendixen, F., 6n. 
Bernoulli, Daniel, 30. 
Bernoulli, James, 30. 
Bernoulli, John, 30, 31. 
Bewegungsempfindungen, 95. 

Black, 47. 

Boltzmann, Ludwig, 6n., 102, 
109; Mach's definition of 
mass accepted by, 107. 

Cantor, Moritz, 21 n. 



Carl's Repertoriunt, 80. 
Carnot, S., 35 f., 38n., 39, 42, 

43, 94, 97. 
Case, T., 6. 

Causality, Fechner's law of, 
60, 98; Last form of the 
law of, 64; Law of, 59ff., 
69, 81; Law of, and free- 
dom of will, 90; Law of, 
defined, 61 ; Law of, empty 
and barren without positive 
experience, 65 ; Various 
forms of the law of, 99; 
Youthful conception of, 64. 
Causation, Concept of func- 
tion substituted for, 101. 
Choice of facts, 57. 
Classical education, 17. 
Clausius, 36, 38n., 43, 62, 97; 

on thermodynamics, 81. 
Clifford, W. K., 11, 108. 
Conformity of nature to 
reason. Science implies, 100. 
Conservation of energy, 
Poincare on the, 102 ; of en- 
ergy, Stallo on evolution of 
the, 101; of matter, 48; of 
weight, 48; of work an in- 
strument of research, 40; 
of work. Law of the, 73 ; of 
work. Theorem of the, 19. 
Contact action, 56. 
I Co-ordinates, System of, 77, 

111 



112 



INDEX. 



Coulomb, 38n., 44, 46. 
Grelle, 34. 

Dampness can perform work, 

43. 
Dependence of phenomena, 

63. 
Determination, Means of, 105. 
Dimensions, Spaces of many, 

94. 
Distance, Forces functions of, 

89,90. 
Duhem, P., 11. 

Ear, Time-sense of the, 90. 
Earthquake, Law of inertia in 

an, 78. 
Economical value of laws and 

explanations, 55. 
Economy of thought, 9, 88, 

94, 109; Principle of, 103. 
Eleatics, 49f . 
Electrical energy. Mechanical 

equivalent of, 44. 
Electricity, No satisfactory 

theory of, 54. 
Elsas, 6. 
Energy, Equivalent of, 44; 

Localization of, 109; of 

heat, 47; The term, 5n., 93. 
Epistemological standpoint, 

Exposition of, 9. 
Equilibrium, Determination 

of, 105. 
Equivalent of energy, 44. 
Erkenntnis und Irrtum, 7n., 

10, 95. 
Euler, 19, 30, 103. 
Experience, Theorems of, 84. 
Explanations, Economical 

value of, 55. 



/ Facts, Choice of, 57. 

Faraday, 19, 93, 108. 

Favre, 37. 

Fechner, 90f.; his formula- 
tion of the law of causality, 
60, 98. 

Fichte's Zeitschrift für 
Philosophie, 87, 88. 

Force, as pressure, 82; Defi- 
nition of, 84; The term, 93. 

Forces, functions of distance, 
89, 90; Mutual indepen- 
dence of, 83; Spatial rela- 
tions recognized by, 89. 

Formula, Economical value 
of a, 55. 

Foucault's experiment, 77. 

Freedom of will. Law of 
causality and, 90. 

Function, Concept of, substi- 
tuted for causation, 101. 
^ Fundamental facts, Choice of, 
57; dependent on custom 
and history, 56. 

Galileo, 20, 23, 29, 31, 38n., 
75, 96, 105; his demonstra- 
tion of the law of the lever, 
66; quoted, 24-28. 

Gauss, 34f., 97, 103. 

Geschichte und Kritik des 
Carno loschen Wärme ge- 
setzes, 94. 

Gibson, W. R. Boyce, 6, 103n. 

Grassmann, Hermann, 106, 
108. 

Gravitation, Newton's theory 
of, 56. 

Gray, George J., 75. 



INDEX, 



113 



Hamilton, 103, 106. 

Hankel, Hermann, 106n., 108. 

Hauptfragen der Physik, 76. 

Heat, and work, Analogy be- 
tween, 107; as motion and 
Substance, 47 f . ; Energy of, 
47; Theory of, 42. 

Helm, 94, 107, 108. 

Helmholtz, 36, 38, 39, 96. 

Heraclitus, 17. 

Herbart, 16, 49, ^. 

Herrmann, £., the political 
economist, 30, 88. 

Hertz, fe., 11, 97. 

Historical studies, 16, 18. 

HofFding, Harald, 6. 

Honigswald, 7n. 

Humidity, 43. 

Huygens, 28, 32, 38n., 96, 105. 

Hypotheses a work of super- 
erogation, Unverifiable, 57. 

Indeiiniteness in nature, 62. 

Independence of forces. Mu- 
tual, 83. 

Inertia, Law of, 24, 72, 93; 
Law of, in an earthquake, 
78 ; Indeiiniteness of law of, 
75ff. 
^ Intelligibility of nature, 99. 

Intelligible space, 87. 

Jahrbuch über die Fortschritte 
der Mathematik, 7n. 

Joule, Z7, 43, 97. 

Jourdain, Philip E. B., 99ff, 
109. 

Journal für reine und ange- 
wandte Mathematik, 34. 

KaBt^:ll, 16; Prolegomena of, 
96. 



Kirchhoff,. 10; 38n., 96; on 

absorption and emission, 81. 

Kleinpeter, Hans, 6n., 98, 102. 

Lagrange, 20, 30-32, 35, 39, 

105, 108. 
Lampe, E., 97n. 
Law, Economical value of a, 

55. 
Lessing, 15. 
Lever, Law of the, 105; Law 

of the, demonstrated by 

Galileo, 66. 
Levi, Adolf o, 7n. 
Lindt, R., 96 
Logic, Mimicry by, 100; of 

natural science, 59. 
Lotos, 85. 

Love, A. E. H., Mach's defi- 
nition of mass accepted by, 

107. 

Mach, 6n. ; Generosity of, 7. 

Maggi, Gian Antonio, Mach's 
definition of mass accepted 
by, 107. 

Malus, 69. 

Mariotte's law, 73. 

Mars, Physics of, 95. 

Mass, Definition of, 5, 10, 80, 
84; Mach's definition of, 
107; Mach's views on, 101. 

Masses, Motion of, 82. 

Matter, Conservation of, 48. 

Maxwell, 6n., 98, 108, 109. 

Mayer, J. R., 19, 36, 37, 39, 43, 
58, 97. 

Mechanical equivalent of elec- 
trical energy, 44; facts not 
more i n t e 1 1 i gi b 1 e than 
others,' 56. 



114 



INDEX. 



Mechanics, 109; Basis of, 32; 
Principle of excluded per- 
petual motion not founded 
on, 41. 

Mechanics, The Science of, 
9n., lln., 93, 95, 96, 97, 101, 
103, 105, 107. 

Mill, J. S., 7n. 

Mimicry by logic, 100. 

Minkowski, H., 95. 

Molecular processes need not 
be represented spatially. 86. 

Monist, 99, 101, 106. 

Motion, absolute, 77 ; Heat as, 
47 ; Newton's laws of, 98n. ; 
of masses, 82. 

Motions, Physical events re- 
duced to spacial, 50. 

Mysticism, 73. 

Nature, Indefiniteness in, 62; 
Intelligibility of, 99; to 
reason. Science implies con- 
formity of, 100. 

Neumann, 37, 38n., 39, 76, 90, 
105. 

Newton, 75, 82; Laws of mo- 
tion of, 98n.; Rotating 
bucket of, 101; Theory of 
gravitation of, 56. 

O'Brien, M., 108. 
Ostwald, 6n., 7n., 11, 38n., 94, 
96. 

Pade, H., 106. 

Pearson, K, 11. 

Perpetual motion, 19, 21 ; Ex- 
amples of theorem of, 71; 
not founded on mechanics. 
Principle of, 41; Principle 



of excluded, 28, 30, 42, S9ff., 
69, 72, 73, 80; Second the- 
orem of excluded, 40. 

Petrovitch, M., 108. 

Petzoldt, 6n., 93, 102. 

Physics, 91; Foundation of, 
thermal or electric, 94; Ob- 
ject of, 89; of Mars, 95. 

Place, Change of, 49. 

Planck, Max, 10, 11, 38n., 
106, 109. 

Poggendorff, 10, 80. 

Poincare, Mach's definition of 
mass accepted by, 107; on 
the conservation of energy, 
102. 

Poinsot, 33f., 71; Couple of, 
68. 

Points of reference, 78. 

Poncelet, 19. 

Popper, J., 11, 16n., 93, 94. 

Popular Scientific Lectures, 
6n., 38n., 91, 96, 97, 107, 
109. 

Position of a system, 97. 

Potential-lever a scalar, and 
not a vector, 94. 

Presentations distinguished 
from our sensations, 91. 

Pressure, Force as, 82. 

Psychology, 91. 

Reason, Science implies con- 
formity of nature to, 100. 

Reference, Points of,. 78. 

Relativity, Principle of, 95. 

Riemann, 88, 97. 

Riess, 45 f. 

Ring, Three bodies on a, 83. 

Rotating bucket, Newton's, 
101. 



INDEX. 



115 



Rotation, Angle of, 60. 
Rumford, ZI, 

Russell, Bertrand, 98, 101, 
105, 106. 

Saint- Venant, Barre de, 106, 
108. 

Scalar, Potential level a, 94. 

Schlömilch's Zeitschrift, 87. 

Science, Alchemy and, 64 ; im- 
plies conformity of nature 
to reason, 100 ; impossible if 
all facts were directly ac- 

• cessible, 54; Logic of natu- 

/ ral, 59; Problem of, 91. 

Scientific theories in general, 
An observation on, 54. 

Silbermann, Zl, 

Soul, 48. 

Space and time not indepen- 
dent entities, 95; dimen- 
sions. Thinkable possibili- 
ties in, 53; Intelligible, 87; 
Intuition of, bound up with 
the organization of the 
senses. 86; of one dimen- 
sion, Tones analogous to, 
87; of three dimensions, 
Chemical elements not rep- 
resented in, 87; Physical, 
interdependence of phe- 
nomena, 89; Presentations 
of, 88; Table showing lim- 
itations of thought analog- 
ous to, 51. 

Spaces of many dimensions, 
94. 

Spatial determinations, 61 ; 
motions, Physical events re- 
duced to, 50; relations rec- 
ognized by forces, 89. 



Stallo, 11,98, 101, 105. 
Stevinus, Simon, 20-23, 31, tiS, 

96. 
Stumpf, C, 6. 
Substance, Heat as, 47 f. 
Sufficient reason. Law of, 66, 

69, 81, 82, 97, 102. 
Symbolical physicists, 102. 
System, Position of a, 97. 

Table showing limitations of 
thought analogous to space 
only, 51. 

Taylor's theorem, 100. 

Temperature, Differences of, 

82. 
.Theories like dry leaves, 74. 

Thermodynamics, Second law 
of, 85, 109. 

Thermoelectrometer, 45. 

Thomson, W., 36, 62, 97. 

Thought analogous to space 
only. Table showing limita- 
tions of, 51. 

Time and space not independ- 
ent entities, 95; is money, 
60; — sense of the ear, 90. 

Tones analogous to space 
of one dimension, 87. 

Top can perform work. A, 71. 

Torricelli, 30-32, 80, 96. 

Tuning-fork a source of 
work, 71. 

Typonoetic theory, 102n. 

Unideterminateness of things, 

105. 
Uniformity of nature, 100. 
Uniqueness, Principle of, 103. 
Universe like a machine, 62. 
, Unverifiablc hypotheses a 
work of supererogation, 57. 



116 



INDEX. 



Varignon, 30. 

Vector, Potential level not a, 

94. 
Velocities, Equalizing, 82. 
Virial, 109. 
Vis viva, 43, 72 ; Principle of, 

96. 
Voss, A., 96, 106, 109. 

Wald, F., 11. 
Warxl, James, 101, 106. 
Wärmelehre, 10, 93, 94, 95, 97, 
103, 107, 109. 



Weight, Conservation of, 48. 
Whitehead, A. N., 109. 
Wiktorov, D., 7n. 

Work, A top can perform, 
71; Analogy between heat 
and, 107; Source of, 69ff; 
The term, Sn., 93. 

Wronsky, 94. 

Wundt, 49; Axioms of, 39f. 

Zeuner, 94; Analogy of, 107. 




1 





1 

< 
< 

< 

< 



i 




